Birdseed
It's been a hectic couple weeks but one thing kept popping up. I came across a blog by a woman who said that when she was doing nothing in particular like shopping, her resting or neutral face looked angry or upset and people were always asking her if she was okay.
You might have imagined that a flapjack was a fairly innocent item of oat-based confectionery, but apparently it is such a toxic substance that Dame Deirdre Hutton, retiring chairperson of the Food Standards Agency, believes it should be banned. It seems that it is so energy-dense in relation to its size that it is a positive invitation to obesity. She said, “I don’t think that supermarkets should be selling this very energy-driven food. We should be making low-calorie food the norm and anything that is high in fat should be niche.” Presumably she believes we should be more like cattle who have to spend all day chomping away because of the low level of nutrition contained in grass.
I am camped out in my sewing room crafting to my heart's content this week (and last week too!) as my kitchen is being decorated and so I have been booted out of my usual haunt! It looks like this today and I'm looking forward to seeing the finished new look by the end of the week.
Now you may recall from my earlier post about it that I might have been left by a circus that not-so-accidently moved on without me. This theory has long been Matilda’s explanation of my coming to reside with her family. You see for her it was the only way to confirm my enormous Dumbo like ears, brillo pad hair and my buck teeth.
Alright, ready for the tour?
So it turned out that sometimes a dream job is to be a loving and caring person whose mission is to make “the children in the shadow” in normal kids who want to study and to make them understand that they are strong people who can have dreams and that they have to struggle to make their life better.
I have also found Pinterest is a great resource for this when I’m feeling a little on the lazy side because I can see pictures versus reading through ingredients and instructions.
But what if Asians did start to make themselves heard? What if the Asian communities across the country started rallying at protests as well? Does anyone remember the story about the Chinese immigrant who was released from detention in New Jersey, and then had to make his way back to the East Village in NYC? I can’t find the article right now, but that was quite a story for about a week. But since then, has the Asian community continued to make themselves heard?
Here it has come out, clear and plain for all to see that protocol was not followed, an individual’s rights were abused and our leaders of Government are MUM….peas tin hitting people mouth in a rage these days, boy….is either that or
*Concern over trade imbalances possibly started fading with 1985 Plaza Accord, but I don't think it completely disappeared from the sphere of legitimate discourse until the passage of NAFTA divided the Democratic Party and globalization protesters were marginalized as kooks in the Nineties.
The beat was constant and the dancing passionate Saturday in Monmouth.
I believe that both of those men have high moral standards and a keen desire to maintain a healthy United States within a healthy world, but my contention is that they are in a position to abuse their enormous powers and there wouldn’t even be a potential for redress of grievance by any individual or even other governmental organizations. They presently know their powers and their limitations and they also know they can do as they please with little chance of corrective punishments being inflicted. If there is no anticipated censure, there is no reason not to abuse their power. The Supreme Court has the power to constrain abuse of power but five of the nine members are from the same watchdog kennel, The Harvard Law School, and are led by Roberts, one of their own from that same elite group. There are 200 approved law schools in the US, but one law school has five of the nine Supreme Court seats. Thus there is little chance of the jealous conflict intended by the Constitution and little chance of restraining abuse of power. That is unquestionably an over-concentration of political power which the Constitution was designed to prevent. But what compounds this potential abuse of power is that our President also comes from that same tiny sliver of American society, Harvard Law School. That is even compounded because both the Chief Justice and the President come from a fragment of that fragment, the Constitutional Law sub-section of The Harvard Law School. How strange it is that the most informed people on the planet of the intent of the Constitution are the very ones who are violating the most cherished principle of democracy, the separation of powers.
this exam
There's a lot of blue in the chaparral at the moment. Still dominant are the white mounding ceonothus bushes that cover the hillsides, but every day as the warm winds disperse the petals the snowy white drifts appear to be melting away. Here and there are the California lilacs, blue ceonothus. There's the occasional blue dick, lots of Solanum, blue eyed grass, rarely, Verbena lasiostachys and the blue blossoms of black sage (don't ask).
I choose to find it fun and easy to exercise everyday! Amen!
It should be noted that when anti-Communist fervor is aroused, the demand for serious evidence in support of claims of “communist” abuses is suspended, and charlatans can thrive as evidential sources. Defectors, informers, and assorted other opportunists move to center stage as “experts,” and they remain there even after exposure as highly unreliable, if not downright liars. Pascal Delwit and Jean-Michel Dewaele point out that in France, too, the ideologues of anticommunism “can do and say anything.” Analyzing the new status of Annie Kriegel and Pierre Daix, two former passionate Stalinists now possessed of a large and uncritical audience in France, Delwit and Dewaele note:
Fortunately, none of the breweries in this neck of the woods can be accused of this practice, but companies from outside the area that do indulge in it, plus pub landlords who stock their products, are doing a dis-service to local concerns by effectively tying up space on the bar with gimmicky products designed to cater for a small niche section of the market.
Sometimes it's not the Legislature, it's the Governor. For reasons unknown (because I'm pretty sure the reasons stated weren't the most important), Governor Rendell suddenly added a highly-paid CEO to the PLCB's towering structure of managing bureaucrats in late 2006, a post that was filled by an out-of-work legislator, apparently with no interview process. The appointment stunk of patronage, and precipitated the resignation of Jonathan Newman, possibly the PLCB's most popular Chairman ever (words that might otherwise never have been strung together in that order...I mean, the mind boggles). It's unclear why the position was needed, but at $100,000+ a year, we've got it to pay for, you and me, taxpayers. Plaything. Patronage source.
ANGELA SULEMAN: As far as I’m concerned, he shouldn’t have done it. But, he’s a doctor. When he’s asked to do something, I guess he doesn’t refuse. …so the doctor actually called and wanted to talk to Nadya, and then, when I realized that was her doctor, I pleaded with him, ‘Please, don’t do this anymore,’ and he promised.
I may not know all the names
Arsenal under-18s concluded their season with a deserved 2-0 victory away to Birmingham City today, but results elsewhere dictated that Steve Bould’s side are now unable to top Premier Academy League Group A.
“I swear it.” And I actually mean it, unlike you.
Diary of a Wedding Planner
Carol Denbow: Greetings Robin, and thank you for joining us on A Book Inside Blog.
Anyway don't let me put you off Unions per se.
J's last regional dance competition of the season was this past weekend. She did great - scored a High Gold award, even when she forgot a whole section of the dance. She was annoyed with herself, but that morning was crappy and I don't blame her for not being fully there. Her groups numbers did phenomenally well, with great placements (8th, 5th, & 2nd in the top 10 of all teen groups - competing against dozens and dozens of teen group numbers from other studios). Now all that's left is the recital and then either a Nationals or something similar in July. Still not sure what we're doing yet.
You can enter more than once. A winner will be chosen from the Random Drawing for week #5 challenge and will be announced Friday February 17th. This winner will win a Marianne Die. The winner will also be entered in the end of the year $100 gift certificate drawing.
Alright, now I've got the majority of the stuff into the suitcases, but I can't find my house keys. I've spent the last 45 minutes tearing my desk apart looking for them, but now that I think about it I'm pretty sure they got left in the ignition after the car accident. I'm pretty sure I remember my aunt telling me the guy who towed it would mail them to me. Oy this is stressful.
This year, there are two outwardly Catholic films coming to the theatres this year (there might be more than two, but there are at least these two). One is called “For Greater Glory” (opens in June), the other is called “The Perfect Family” (opens 5/4). Synopses and trailers follow:
Now we can start with the hard part, folds the little bow. It’s a little bit trial and error but in the end it’s not so hard as it looks like. To ensure the bow from loosening we have to sew the bow with pink sewing thread.
I mean, it's bad enough these days with the overprotective helicopter parents and the kids being super-indulged and running around crazy in restaurants while the parents sigh and say "Isn't Colton adorable?" But this is fucked up. If you think your 8-year-old needs a mani-pedi, you are hereby sentenced to watch 10 episodes of "Toddlers and Tiaras" UNIRONICALLY. That means no laughing/no making fun of anyone on that show.
The amount of time you spend studying every day depends on your grade level, the difficulty of your coursework, and the extracurricular activities you’re involved in.
What the hell is wrong with this girl that she didn’t stick up for herself?
+ It lengthens, perhaps not as well as a lengthening mascara, but I actually prefer one that has a balance of the length and volume it adds.
If ever there was a word like that. If not, well, I just created one. Maybe I should copyright it! What say?
I don't like anything about you
06. Akula Owu Onyeara
Does a French SPC have any effect in Monaco? More specifically, can a French SPC produce a direct or indirect effect in Monaco?A direct effect may simply result from the French SPC having a legal effect in Monaco, while an indirect effect could be that the existence of a French SPC effectively renders the lack of an SPC in Monaco irrelevant by governing the sales and price of the product in Monaco.
Yes, knee walking. As in she speeds around with arms swinging at her sides like a wind up doll pounding the pavement with her knees! They get red and a little sore but she doesn’t mind. Maybe she just enjoys all the attention that she gets by passersby? Maybe it’s her kind way of saving us the dilemma of finding shoes that fit her size 1 feet if she was properly walking?!
speaking French - why is that bad?
As a person who has spent a lot of time with old ladies (I was the unofficial full body masseuse at my local retirement home, until the police got involved), I have noticed that they all share one thing in common. They all love illness.
In 2006, one of his piano works, “Forgotten Dreams”, written in 1954, became the background for a British TV advertisement for mobile phone company ’3′. Previously, Los Angeles station KABC-TV used the song as its sign-off theme at the end of broadcast days in the 1980s, and Mantovani‘s recording of the song had been the closing theme forWABC-TV‘s “Eyewitness News” for much of the 1970s.
definitely granite. Built to withstand the rough weather off the west coast of Scotland…you know, all those battering Atlantic winds! It’s up on top of a cliff, surrounded by a high granite wall, with lots of foliage to hide it from sight from the water below.
” Whining, as defined by expert —
The orphanages that Vika grew up in were smaller than most and housed only 100 to 200 children at a time. Each room had approximately 30 beds that were stacked head to toe. The beds were old military cots that had been left over from the last war with mattresses that were thin where metal poked through as she slept. The pillows were old and small and felt like a bag of rocks, if she had a pillow at all. Blankets were a luxury that only the bigger and stronger kids kept to protect against the cold Russian winter nights.
When Mr du Plessis informed the couple that they were to vacate the property, as he had intentions of renovating the home for his two sons, they apparently refused. According to Mr du Plessis, the couple were arrogant.
*Challenge: I’ve been having some stomach reactions that I believe are related to food intolerances. Solution: Cook and take foods from home that I know I can tolerate. This would allow me to eat nearly all my meals comfortably on my own without having to depend on finding some place to eat. Opted for: This solution. Executed it by cooking and freezing most of my food the night before travel. This allowed the frozen food to act almost as ice and keep everything else in my cooler cold.
Sometimes life just gets plain ol' complicated... You know what I mean?
Combine couscous with 1/4 cup water; divide evenly among packets, placing on top of spinach.
Buys: 11 (not all 2012 releases)
Metal from the mid 80's thru the early 90's.
Manhattan faces and eyes forever for me.
run to your nearest fried pickle maker!
Proportions fit the profile of the bike pretty well
We were having a rough time--me with life, you with me--and we took a day out of the struggle to go swimming. I suppose I could undergo years of therapy to understand why I took out Alabama on you, but let's just say I was a mean fool. The relentless heat and humidity, the overbearing pace of grad school, the rapist that came to the screen door that day, the cockroaches marching in the leaves at night, the acrid fog of mosquito spray in the air, the relentless questions about whether we were married and which church we attended, the seemingly endless parade of objectionable morons with guns, including the idiot in the yard next door who shot bee-bees into a writhing squirrel he had locked in a cage... . It was all too much.
Vivid Red
The MIGHT MAKES FIGHTS essay cited above already gave an example of "dynamis" in its character as generalized energy of any kind, said example being one of the least conflictive comics-pages I know, Harvey Pekar's "Making Lemonade." So I need not repeat that here.
Finally my husband came in from his night shift. I was just getting ready to eat breakfast and we were paying bills online, when much to our surprise... In comes my doctor and specialist with the news. "We are delivering you in an hour." They were clearing an OR for my delivery as they spoke.
And that's just the fabric! In their haberdashery section they have some really useful, time-saving piped bias binding, a selection of handmade bias binding in the prettiest fabrics,
You may also realize that your outline should be more or less detailed. Making a second or third outline is absolutely wonderful for this editing method. It allows you to base re-structuring on whatever components you see fit (ideas, evidence, plot, character introduction). Best of all, this type of editing, while time consuming, is also very fun and exciting. With this editing method, you can literally see a dead work of writing come to life.
Boy! this guy is really torked!!!! Could we wonder what Pelosi did to him to make him so mad?
Welcome to "Favorite Resource This Week", a weekly link-up hosted here on our blog. All of us have so many wonderful resources that we come across and use every week, and it's great to link up and share our favorites! **Resources of any type are fair game...books, videos/DVDs, websites, favorite television programs, computer games, field trip ideas, ideas for using old materials in a different way...anything that has worked well for your family.** Feel free to use a post you've already written that's applicable and link it up! If you don't have a post, it's fine to just leave a comment...and remember to check back and see what others are sharing!
How can this be? We are in Obama’s recovery.
she does know that she loves us.
We help her outside.
Regal is now one of the largest family-owned-and-operated boat manufacturing companies in the world, with factories in Orlando, Florida, and Valdosta, Georgia. With 650,000 sq. ft. of manufacturing space and as many as 700 plus people, we are well equipped to build some of the best boats in the world. Sometimes we say we are in the people business and we build great boats. Everything begins and ends with people. That is why we included the word “relationship” in our mission statement. We have some of the best boat builders in the world. Their commitment and craftsmanship makes our product truly Regal.
I like to talk about the intellectual DNA still embedded in hip hop lyrics that we need to recover, and this verse is a good example. The Common line I quote above gets right to the heart of some recent Bill Maher "real Black President" backlash. What Maher wants to say, and has said before, is that he wants his President to do the knowledge, but don't lose that thug sensibility, because Thugism is not all bad. Common nails the sentiment with room to spare should he choose to tweet it out.
Boots: Zara
“I reject an argument that says we’ve got to roll back protections that ban hidden fees by credit card companies, or rules that keep our kids from being exposed to mercury, or laws that prevent the health insurance industry from exploiting people who are sick,” Obama said. “And I reject the idea that somehow if we strip away collective bargaining rights, that we’ll be somehow better off.
Try this simple mediation next time you’re in the shower, and leave a comment in the box below to share how it went. Blessings on your bathtub!
Chenna poda, an incredible Indian cheesecake from Orissa, actually we used to make many sweets like rasogollas,pedas etc from chenna aka paneer a well known Indian cheese..This irresistible cheesecake from Orissa is also prepared from homemade freshly prepared paneer along with simple ingredients..Eventhough this cake is quite famous in Orissa, its totally new for me, after missing last month's challenge coz of my surgery i was waiting eagerly for this month's challenge, when Srivalli announced Indian Cooking Challenge with this chenna poda as this month's challenge i was really excited and try out few days back this super addictive Indian cheesecake..Its turned out super prefect with a wonderful super moist texture as this recipe is prepared completely with paneer along with small quantity of rava,sugar, cashews and raisins..Thanks to Srivalli for this wonderful challenge, i simply enjoyed it..I choosed Shibani's version which sounds super easy for me also i used my silicon individual muffin mould for making this cheesecake..
I considered this issue en passant yesterday in my weekly Postcard. The Legal Services Board has announced a proposal to quiz lawyers on whether their parents went to university in an attempt to monitor the level of social mobility across the profession. I remain unconvinced as to whether this proposal is anything other than intrusive and, possibly, patronising. But I am, of course, happy to be convinced that it is a good idea.
Though its not perfect, its certainly, much better than before! Not pictured is the new watering station I made for the dogs. I bought two matching stainless steel bowls and a waterproof mat. Much nicer than the mismatched plastic bowls on the fireplace.
The real question that I always have to ask myself about a biopic – is it a hagiography? Do Black and Van Sant show Milk as a man or a legend? I think that with Penn’s help, they largely achieve the former – there are moments when Milk’s fervor for the movement seems self-serving (he does seem to love to be in the public eye) and overzealous (calling for ALL gay men and women to come out, regardless of personal safety or feelings). Then there’s the question of his love of younger, often unstable, men, something that Milk never fully develops as a theme, but that it tends to use more as a symbol of Milk’s sense of mortality, which I think is cheating a little bit.
it’s a great idea
Guess I should send her Halloween costume back... she could just dress up like a little vampire! :P I'll be sure to post pics when they pop out ;)
Me: (cracking up!) Do you mean my cousin's kids?
Left a good job in the city, working for the man every night and day.
He had poured his heart and soul into that drawing, and now she wanted to keep it!
Here are the cases, just as they are explained in the EDPS 2010 Activity Report:
On another subject, the Mariners have signed veteran right-hander Brian Sweeney to a minor league contract. If Sweeney makes the Rainiers, this will be his third go-around with Tacoma. He pitched for the Rainiers from 1999-2003, and 2010. He’s spent a lot of time in Japan.
I am a great fan of baseball, and over the last few years there has been an enormous explosion of interest in the use of performance enhancing drugs in the sport, and the attempts to stamp this out.
Frank Oz, of the guild Electric Mayhem.
Johnstone asked Ms. O'Grady to clarify what she meant by 'brief'; to which Ms. O'Grady responded "It doesn't matter, It is to let the reader know how you received the news, and if you intend to do anything further."
You look at me and simply smile
The OAS has often been criticized, However, for promoting US interests.
I knew that I was getting a little 'wild' but frankly, I liked the way that I felt so much that I suppose that I felt like the risk was worth it. But believe me, its not. Well....live and learn.
Congratulations Jen! If you could email me with your address please, I'll get your prize in the post for you.
The issue at hand is a very subtle one, and as someone who is extremely serious about not only the Bible itself, but about the challenges of discipleship in the church, having seen growing numbers of Christians recently take up this idea of a ‘Daniel fast’ the time has come to say something.
Their ideas about holograms, cars floating, seeing your friends while playing on the X-box surprised me with the thought they put into it! :)
There are a number of possible replies (impracticality, epistemic hurdles etc). The next argument is one of them.
It was dark.
have shot up newsrooms, kidnapped and killed staff members and called up the media regularly with threats that were not the least bit veiled…. ‘They mean what they say,’ said one of the many terrified journalists who used to cover the police beat in Reynosa. ‘I’m censoring myself. There’s no other way to put it. But so is everybody else.’
Is there an area in your home or office you would like to organize, streamline, or re-purpose? Here are some things to think about before you begin. Answering these questions first will serve as a guide to the process of improving your space.
A few yards down the Sego Canyon Road, you come to another Barrier Art panel on the right of the road and on the far side of a corral. As we didn’t want to go on someone’s private property, we just admired the drawings from a distance. These drawings are riddled with bullet holes and are not quite as well-preserved as the previous panels, but they are still impressive when you consider how long they have endured the ravages of time.
I had a sudden, unpleasant realization recently -- I am the Betty White of fashion-blogging. Not only am I older than you, I'm older than your mother. Ouch!
In Shifting Sand Land, arch over to the timberline that is next to the oasis. Angle beneath the tree, and the bold will bastardize you to a metal belvedere in the quicksand area. The cannon is there, as able-bodied as a atramentous brick block. You can aswell bastardize from the metal belvedere to the tree.
diku maro/mari dahyo/dai
Alan Whittle, the trust's £150,000-a-year chief executive, said they were confident of returning conditions to an acceptable standard before the deadline of next Monday set by the Care Quality Commission.
“You were losing great scene” One commented while pointing eyes towards Girl seating in Corner Table.
Here’s the plot: A bookish Hottie gets her bloomers in a rustle over this gloomy Gus who thinks he is all of that and a turkey sandwich. He also wears a cape like Dr. Acula, and comes out of her mirror one evening so they can do the Hustle. Then the babe and Gus and her sister and the sister’s boyfriend go to a big ball and Gus reverts to form. Stuff gets said, jealousies inflamed, then suddenly—Duel time. Long story short: Gus is a real prick (plus now a killer) and even though the Hottie meets a nice Rear Admiral (or something), she still wants to kiss him one more time. Which she does. Then she tells him to get the hell out of her boudoir. Curtain.
I first encountered most of this album from the video Live in Pompett, as a kid I thought look at those weird hippies in an empty ruin playing, how funny. Little did I know that I listening to, probably some of the best rock music ever to be written. The live version of echos is outstanding too and different enough to justify the purchase of the Live DVD alone.
Shanghai, Beijing, and Hong Kong are complete playgrounds for architecture photographers. On a clear day standing on the viewing catwalk of the second largest building in the world, the World Financial Center allows for a break-taking overview of Pudong and the eastern Shanghai.
Oh the post title, one of the small joys of spending time on the train or in the car is I get to listen to more music than previously.
The next image: Back home for the only good day before the next load of storms. I’ll see what I get when I finally wake up.
When police raided the home of one of the men in Northcote Street, Newcastle, they found a welcoming sign above the door - an imitation axe and the Metgumbnerbone emblem of a skull.
*** Closed off body language (i.e. standing at distance, folded arms, body moved away from yours, trying to avoid eye contact).
Rachael Ray worked front of the house in restaurants and in food retail, but was never trained in cooking. She had no food business of her own and taught basic cooking classes.
It is time for a new series of laws that restore the death penalty for convicted paedophiles and that also allows the courts to deport all naturalised citizens involved in paedophilia.
My kitchen spent some time like this:
2 clout
In naked majesty seemed lords of all:
“It gives me satisfaction to be able to improve the lives of others. Their most common lament is that they wish they could turn back the clock, so that they won’t repeat the mistakes of their past and be where they are today.”
A partial backdown by the Indonesian government over fuel price hikes has opened rifts in the political establishment in Jakarta and brought sharp condemnation in the international financial media. The planned increases, which were due to come into force on April 1, had provoked widespread popular protests.
Lately, I've been reading Oktay a line a time. I study his word choice and style. One line at a time I think I'll be able to learn to love him, not because maybe I should, but because it's an exercise on self-knowledge to me. Why is it that I can't enjoy his writing? How can I change the way I feel about it?
The dysfunction of the old consciousness and the arising of the new are both accelerating. Paradoxically, things are getting worse and better at the same time, although the worse is more apparent because it makes so much 'noise.'
Wilson, an immigrant from the United Kingdom who now resides in a Jerusalem-area community, told paramedics and police officers that she and Logan were assaulted by two Arab men while hiking at Khirbet Hanut, an archaeological site near Beit Shemesh.
WOW!!! is the most common comment after just 5 minutes on the Chi Machine! Many claim to have a love affair with their Chi Machine because it like having their own Oriental Massager! You will feel more energized and have a greater sense of well being with use of the machine.
Instead of hanging up Mikayla's "Baby's First Christmas" ornament, I have ornaments of angels and butterflies that are in memory of her. These ornaments mean more to me than any ornament I have ever hung on a Christmas tree, but I wish they didn't have to exist.
18. Beware the Ides of March," said the soothsayer to Julius Caesar. His English was impeccable.
To be perfectly honest, I am not at all knowledgeable about wines - luckily Designer Cyclist and her hubby are experts, and took me on a guided tour down center aisle throughout the event. A complete lightweight, I am normally done after one glass - but for some reason I was able to hold up at the event and got to try tons of amazing wines. I can't name half of them, but I do remember Jeio Cuvée Rosé Prosecco, from Bisol - a medium-bodied sparkler with fruity notes (do I sound somewhat like I know what I'm talking about? No? Ok.) I also loved that the event offered a range of cocktails and mocktails as well. My favs were Fine Print cocktail from A-Frame - with its luscious layers of sweet / tangy/ floral flavors from rum, hibiscus, falemum, lime and orange bitters, the Olympus Mons with ginger and lemon infused artisanal vodka from Moon Mountain, and the POM Julep - which was refreshing and critical to hydrate between sips of alcohol.
Ma only cries if she’s peeling onions. Didn’t so much as sniffle even when we discovered those McGregor kids all blown to pieces, but that night, when Paul appeared on the screen, I could feel her body sobbing like she was a car doing kangaroos.
Tired of feeling inconsequential.
Zebra also features "link analysis", the description says, a tool to help agents identify relationships between individuals based on an analysis of their calling patterns.
We say we believe in grace but impose rules.
“With that many single work circles they really are more suited to having their own events.”
our day started at 4.45 with make-up..
This is a very unique book about grim reapers. Lex is a character that I could see many people not liking much, especially in the beginning, but I thought she was a great girl! She's rough, short with people, and brutally honest. Not your typical YA heroine, but she was fun in my opinion. As one reader said in a review--Lex is an antiheroine and I thought the perfect personality for the story!
EASY PEANUT BUTTER PIE
and Nigeria’s fourth position is
Thank Goodness it will return to the high 80's by the middle of the week.
Andrew J. Bacevich, International Relations and History, Boston University, and retired career officer in the U.S. Army. Bacevich is the author of “Washington Rules: America’s Path to Permanent War” (2010) and “The Limits of Power: The End of American Exceptionalism” (2008). Bacevich will address several urgently important questions: “More than a decade into the ‘Global War on Terror,’ where has that conflict taken us? What has it achieved? What has it cost?” 147 NW 19th.
The day started at 7:30 when Nico (our driver) picked up us for our last journey to the orphanage. As we drove through the gate the tears started! This was the actual moment that Lee and I have been dreaming about for an entire year. We walked through the doors to Olivia's group and there she was in the arms of my favorite Nanny!
Ans : Larry Crowne. A movie that makes little sense, lets you figure out the ending about 10 minutes after the opening credits, and somehow, still manages to keep you glued to the screen with a stupid grin on your face. That is, provided you sat down to be entertained and not to go through it as soon as possible so that you can publish your invaluable opinions on film-making on IMDB.
Friday night. i lean into the water and think
In my last post, I mentioned that I did two hours of ironing for Sam in exchange for a promise to alter my rabbits hutch in return. A form of bartering.
5. Place lid on tightly and shake well… you can stir if you want, but I like to dance around the kitchen while I shake the onions… don’t laugh.
63. Bullet Ballet ^
I take a bag of chicken breasts. Thaw until they are easy to slice. I slice down the middle like a butterfly cut. This makes each breast thinner. It is also easier if they are still a bit on the frozen side. I put them on my broiler pan. I drizzle with olive oil and then add spices. Some nights I might choose a Mrs. Dash flavor or Cavender's. Other nights I will choose Montreal Chicken Seasoning. When my herb garden is in full swing, I might just grab some fresh herbs and use those sprinkled with some Kosher Salt. It isn't rocket science..just use the herbs that your family likes. I then bake it at 375 until done. It takes less than 30 minutes in my oven. I serve it was a large green salad. If it were on a weekend, I would make some homemade bread and a dessert to dress it up a bit...oh wait, I wouldn't serve this dish on a weekend. This is just my go to weekday meal plan!
The cashiers at the supermarket are quite friendly to me too. Before, they treated me like a moron... instructing me not to take the shopping basket home. Yes, home! Why would I do that? HAHAHAHA But now, they always greet me with a big smile (yes, even the grumpy ones) and there are times when I would get extra stamps for my free 4 euro savings booklet.
A Place Under the Sun is a love song. Haroula Rose is offering her lover a refuge from the fears expressed in the previous two songs. The tenderness is something you can almost stir with a spoon here, and it is a beautiful thing. The music does something quite surprising. The song begins as a folk ballad, with the mood led by banjo and cello. Eventually, a piano joins the mix, but played with a light touch. The arrangement remains mostly acoustic, but the song becomes a rock song, a power ballad if you will. It’s a question of how the instruments are used, and it is never over the top. Actually, it really works beautifully. The arrangements on These Open Roads range from folk to rock, with even some Motown influences at times. Throughout, the lyrics are heartfelt, the vocals warm and emotional, and the arrangements endlessly creative.
Was it me or were there more and more books about ska and ska bands available to read in 2011? Librarians with librarian degrees should make sure these books get into libraries. Pauline Black of The Selecter set the bar high with her no holds barred autobiography 'Black By Design' which recounts her experiences growing up as a bi-racial child adopted by a white family in 60's era Britain. It also takes an unflinching look at her life and times in the early days of the birth of 2-Tone and The Selecter. I was also a fan and regular reader of Horace Panter's blog on The Specials website titled 'Specials U.K. Tour By Sir Horace Gentleman'. The posts are detailed updates -- part travelogue and part tour diary -- of The Specials experiences on their very last U.K. tour (at least until 2013) and picked up where Panter's excellent read 'Ska'd For Life' left off.
Name: CASTANON, LUIS MARTIN (alias: CASTANON, LUIS VANEGAS
Joan Allen (Pleasantville)
This blog has changed me. Don't get me wrong, yes it has changed me, but for the better. When I first started this...well,here's a surprising secret from the author- I didn't know a thing about fashion. Yes,you read that right. When I started, my usual outfit were jeans or shorts, a random t-shirt, ponytail, and flip-flops. It never changed from that either. Until Sunday, which the bottoms turned into a skirt.Still, this blog helped me to realize there are more cute things out there to wear.
SS: I really love your characters. Especially the ones in Mighty Flynn. Everybody’s so unique. How do you build your characters?
Hofbrau Weiss
Are you a meticulously clean person? Or have you, too, felt the shame of having to haul a huge stack of books with no particular home into a back bedroom amongst unfolded laundry and an unmade bed to make at least PART of the house presentable? My mother and my grandmother were/are always SUPER bad about spring cleaning and purging their houses of unnecessary items. I love them, but rethinking household management of items was never a strength. If there was a shelf or a box or a cabinet to put it in, whatever spoon, wall hanging, fifteen year old dress was STAYING. The time frame for onset of this behavior in my grandmother confuses me, as there's neither hide nor hair of the wackadoodle, adorable Heywood-Wakefield esque end tables I see in family photos, nor the fifties' console tv, nor any other atomic age trappings...yet any item that drifted into the house past the year 1975 is still in the house. Like a dinner guest that won't leave. Who knows? Maybe semi-hoarding was her midlife crisis.In my mom's case, the pack-rattin' was actually kind of a boon for high school age me, as despite a slight height differential, we were about the same size, and her entire bicentennial high school wardrobe was pretty much intact in cardboard boxes in the attic when I discovered them in seventh grade on an expedition into the attic for Christmas decorations. Dresses, skirt and blouse sets, and what seemed like endless patterned shirts were worn and worn and worn until eventually being decommissioned from sheer tattiness. Do you ever wonder if the deep crimson-with-with-sheer-black-overlay Homecoming outfit from the year 2000, so heinous to you now you practically have to use tongs to put it in the going-to-Goodwill pile, will someday set the pulses of future generations of vintageophiles racing? I hope not, but I reckon so.
Houses Cleaned: 1 Very, Very messy house.
This week marks the release of recording artist Rihanna (Robyn Rihanna Fenty)’s sixth studio album, Talk That Talk. Originally from Barbados, the 23-year-old has won four Grammys and sold over 20 million albums in just seven years. Her successes have placed her in the arena of superstars like Madonna and Michael Jackson — among the ranks of the best-selling artists in modern history.
the right, political economy to the left--natural history, the physical
It will take a thousand or more voices to fill the void left by the loss of Andrew Breitbart. Rest in Peace, Happy Warrior. Thank you for blazing the trail and for showing us the way. We’ll take it from here, and we’ll never forget you.
We are really having fun with Drawing Textbook. Tay is learning a lot about shading and how to draw with perspective. The spinach cans on her second drawing are meant to look like they are behind each other. This concept took some work, but after some time she was able to get it. She was very proud of herself.
(Snuck up and captured this rare shot of Readerensis Reluctibus. Note the ripped jeans. Would much rather be tree-climbing than reading. However, AMAZON caused him to take a moment from his busy day to book-snuggle.)
He also followed a stream figuring it would lead to a lake where there might be people.
Furthering the films-as-dream metaphor, each of the levels in the main dream resembles an action movie in its own right. First, there's a kidnapping caper, then a "who-can-you-trust" corporate thriller (that later turns rather Matrix-y), and finally a James Bond spy romp (complete with unusual modes of travel and guarded fortresses).
And just when I'd about given up on them making the story their own, one tiny little girl stepped up to deliver her version of Pecos Bill's birth on the prairie. Bright eyed and with a smile she told the crowd that Pecos Bill's real name was Bob and after he fell into the river and nearly drowned he was raised by a pack of werewolves.
unable to move,
The giveaway will end at 2pm PST, Monday, May 14th. The winner will be chosen by random.org and announced later that day!
I'm breaking out the Verve today - yumm! Miracles Blossom is one of my all time favorite Verve sets and I can't resist the tulips - my favorite flower. The papers are again from Marjolaine by Basic Grey.
I’m a catch
Not exactly. Getting it around was important, sure, but otherwise it was just a symbol (you’re catching the recurring motifs (you’re seeing how all the terms are coming together (sah da tay*))) of responsibility. At this point that’s what the titles are. They don’t really symbolize anything in and of themselves, and they should have the indoctrinating effect of the ring from Lord of the Rings or Pamela Anderson in Baywatch or, if you’re like me, Rosario Dawson if she had hardly anything on (and it is AWESOME to see that).
I saw the sacred waterfall when I was young
as a former painter, this blog brings back fond memories for me.
In the end, I became something of a grouch, as my girls heard me playing my LPs and decided to dance along while I warned them not to get too vigorous too close to the turntable as it might scratch the discs. I might as well have been playing them Pink Floyd, and soon decided it was taking far too long anyway. Besides, when you took into consideration the hours wasted in this venture, it often proved easier to track down the LPs in CD format via the internet or trawls through charity and record shops.
So because of his avid consumption of and promotion of meat, Simpson became a bloodthirsty, violent double-murderer, and later kidnapper and robber. What better place than the former home of such a person to have a "Murder Museum" which would teach visitors that "Murder begins on our plates"?
Red's Rye was right up Cathy's alley as she loves the red/amber ales. Just the right amount of sweet malt and hops for her. I had to agree with her on this, a very nice blend that was easy to drink. Pours a very nice red color with a light tan head. Could really smell the caramel, grapefruit and malted rye. It was such a pleasing blend of the sweet caramel and bitter grapefruit. It kind of felt more like an IPA, but I think the rye malt was what distinguishes it in the end.
On a positive note…Well, at least I know the specifics of what I need to be working on …I should consider making these images my screen savers
The hops are there but again too balanced and underwhelming and hidden by the fizz.
Or at least a little bit of sunshine.
Hartnell puts in a fantastic performance in a period when his health was declining and he was getting rather lacklustre. Peter Purves also gives a great performance as Steven. Even the much unloved Dodo is reasonably good in this story. The guest cast are rather a mixed bunch; Anthony Jacobs is certainly very good as Doc Holliday.
LYRIC: “We can try to understand The New York Times’ effect on man.”
But in the end, and in keeping with my philosophy about good and bad beers, I would not turn up my nose at a cold bottle of Iron City proffered by an old friend or a potential new friend. I think when I have another Iron City beer, I’ll likely drink it straight from the bottle and I’ll drink it while watching a sporting event in person or on television, and I’ll plan on having lots of greasy food on hand. Setting and circumstance? You bet!
A summer beer needs to be no less flavorful than any other beer, it just needs to be light and refreshing. But so often, to get the "light," breweries offer a watery, uninteresting beer. It's fine on a hot day, and maybe even preferable to something heavier and tastier, but it's not ideal.
As always, it was such a joy to take time out of our busy days to simply sit and bask in the warmth of friendship. Listening to Emanuela share a tomato sauce recipe in her lyrical Italian voice, watching knitting needles busily flying... it's nourishment to my soul.
The trousers are smart enough for work wear but will look great with a loose oversized denim shirt and the ballet pumps at weekends.
And what of her “adventure”? Well, she spends a fortnight in a nunnery, where she takes comfort in routine and quiet, and then she takes a trip to Oz in search of a hermit and a hunk (naturally, she tells her nun advisers only of her desire to find the former). Nothing dramatic happens, though she does get to play Operation – yes, I do mean the battery-operated game – with Jesus (and even the son of God, it seems, struggles when it comes to extracting the tricky spare rib). I must not reveal, here, whether her travels result in the bagging of a husband. But I will say that this is a brave and beautiful book, and Lia is lucky to have a publisher who, though he must secretly have longed for another volume of Fluffy (her 2007 hit about a talking bunny and the neurotic man it takes for its father), has allowed her so intimately to follow her heart.
Family worship times at home are ideal for learning and practicing this! If a child is old enough to understand the concept of using an "inside voice" (talking) versus an "outside voice" (yelling), the child will soon be able to understand that behavior during a worship service should be different than playing at home. If your child asks, "Why?", you'll be able to smile. Your child has just asked why we respect God...a great place to start teaching!
Psalm 117:1-2
Picture: The Artist
“Doubt it, kiddo.” We arrived at our driveway and started towards the porch.
So, we did what any young Army stud would do. We signed up. And then we basically got caught up at work and never ran more than three miles a day until the Big Race. Oy.
DYFS policy specifically mandates the requirements on foster families
the return of British soldiers. This makes no difference to my view of
I was fascinated to encounter almost everything I have read or heard or known culturally in this book – the fairy tales, the epics, the folktales, the history books, cultural changes, religion, social prejudices, games.. its intertextual and we relate… from Snow White’s story to the game of snakes and ladders.. we see how Rushdie has bound it all into one book. Oh! A note of caution, it’s a postmodern novel with postcolonial politics, therefore, constantly, the chronicler, our Saleem wonders what is genuine or authentic… there is a soul-searching and self-reflection on writing of fiction itself… and the idea of a one India created by the West is discarded and in place there are multiple Indias which is the truth of the matter …. but he warns you time and again it all fiction, it’s all a story…
This month’s big trip to Victoria is coming up very soon! We are all very excited to visit the Province’s capital, so our fun fact for this week is about Victoria!
Sometimes when I'm on the bike I think of Kurt. I imagine what that feels like, to run so smoothly. With each pedal stroke I can imagine a running stride. Up, down, up, down. I imagine I'm him, at the 18 mile mark of a marathon. Wanting to stop but knowing I still have something left. I have a few miles left in me. Pushing on, imagining people lining the street next to me, cheering and clapping. I pedal on, in my mental marathon.
144. “Champions are propelled by desire, not compelled by fear.” – Denis Waitley
A sickness, a mania perhaps,
This was of course years before a true gay rights movement existed in any recognizable form. It was also a time in which being an open homosexual could be seen as an invitation for getting the shit beat out of you. He instructed his picketers to wear appropriate business attire including suits and ties in order to not draw attention to themselves in a negative way.
But the word “God” is not like all these words that are contextual, that is, inherently meaningless. God is not the opposite of the Devil either. I do not mean gods like the archetypical psychological distinctions of mythological astrology. I mean like what the Chinese call the Tao.
My new found zest for purging my crowded mind into the blogosphere has proven to be quite refreshing. However, sleep deprived as I am these days, I am finding one crippling flaw in this recent creative writing exercise. I now have a new earworm in the form of obsessing over how flawed my writing is. I find that after every new post, I toss and turn in bed dissecting the piece in my thoughts and wondering how, how, how, can I ever have a career as a writer when I succeed in only producing trite little trinkets of indulgent observation. A perfect example is my last entry. How could I have possibly compared Nanny McPhee to Flow? There are so many flaws in that analogy I can't seem to stop thinking about them all. Here are the three big ones:
The author of ‘Letter for Carlos’ is Michael Morpungo, better known for War Horse (recently adapted by Spielberg from book to the big-screen), and lesser known as a writer of stories from the point of view of an Argentinian soldier during the Falklands war.
“Every year, 140 students are admitted to the Veterinary Science Faculty and only 22 white matriculants from the 2011 group may be admitted. The vast majority of the applicants are white students, but the University of Pretoria set out to recruit black students in order to meet the demographic targets,” said Oberholzer.
Jingling… Beneath the fiery gulmohur, with
I really don’t understand people who plan each day months in advance… ok sometimes I guess it might be good,,, but most of the time??? Lol no, we never know what is to happen, why plan and be disappointed? Or maybe it just me, I like, more like loving living my day each day as it comes, I never know what I am going to do, so when I do something its fun, and I am happy doing it :) I honestly don’t think I would be to happy, having my days plan out in advance,,, would you?
Animal and grain sacrifices are admittedly a bit outside of our everyday experience, making it easy to identify this as an ancient Israel problem from which we can easily detach ourselves. Eugene Peterson’s The Message expresses the thought in a way that brings it a little closer to home.
And so the story leads the audience through twists and turns to a gratifying end. After the ordeal, Jenny said: “I feel old, but not very wise.” It could well be the sign of maturity itself. There’s no short cut to adulthood after all. Great cast, impressive performance, entertaining story, enjoyable education.
This trip I had more goodbyes to say more love to give more hugs to treasure and store in my memory.
Bring about 2 quarts salted water to a boil in a large saucepan.
It is disturbing to see what is happening with the elections coming up on my geographic horizon. The subscription TV which the fireteacher pays good money for out of his hard-earned chipster cheque is showing Arnie Terminator/Twins flicks through the night, every night. Hey dudes, where's my Battle of Algiers, my Wild Pacific, my Spike Lee post-Katrina documentary? No question over which side the satellite hovers. How much did THAT cost?
“Where?” I repeated, squinting.
8. Serakel 5:06
Meanwhile work on what will soon by our home – the basement - is forging ahead. The dividing walls that need to be erected are now largely in place and the windows are now beginning to be fitted. Minor amendments have been made to the position of some windows at our request as we want to maximize the views and vistas. Light fittings are now looming as the next major decision to be made and less importantly but something I want to make a start on this year is the planting of one or two more fruit trees.
PS4 rumours
9. Monitors elections and prevents illegal election activities of special interest groups.
Philosophical journalists would be an interesting breed. I don’t mean bent, bearded men toting reporters’ notebooks and tape recorders stumbling across Capital Hill–although that would be interesting. Nor do I mean reporters jabbing politicians with barbs about how the latest bill violates Kant’s categorical imperative. Instead, I imagine people curious to see what other people think, people who like asking questions about our basic assumptions.
10ml Apple Juice
The Adult Business Association (ABA) estimates the number of illegal sex services in the metropolitan area exceeds 400. "It's out of control," association spokesman Chris Seage said.
Front 242 U-men B
I used all MME "Lost & Found" papers that I cut out and around some of the glittered borders from them, and made a frame with it. I put some thin foam under it to pop it up off the paper so it looks like a "stage". I loved the look and enjoyed working with glitter so much that I used some RAK glitter on Millie's bow on her tail and her pretty ballet shoes. I Love, Love those cute details!
Simply put: I won't get a voter's ID card when I don't yet have my national ID card. My national ID card will live LONG after elections are over!
I’m wise enough to understand that when a few people get together for a quiet braai and a few drinks, after a strenuous week, ancient evil mythical figures or mysterious biblical characters are the last things people want to talk about. Although I can comprehend why people tend to avoid negative or depressing subjects that may spoil the atmosphere of the moment, it sometimes boggles my mind how the ‘Way of Cain’ has become the norm.
Financing and Maintenance
April 13, 2012
David Crowder Band has a new CD out called Remedy. I don’t think there are finer musicians on the planet right now than David Crowder Band so when they release a CD I listen carefully to their lyrics. Crowder sings on this CD that the world is a difficult place to live in just now. Crowder says that we, you and me, should be the Remedy to this broken world. He sings on the last song Surely We Can Change:
I probably shouldn’t be making light of it, but in the two hours that I was out alone when I wrote that last post, my relies still felt the need to send out a search party… Granted I didn’t notice my phone ring twice. Though, I’m not entirely sure how they were expecting to find me in Jakarta’s busy streets.
LIFETIME relationships teach you lifetime lessons;
This beer is only available for a short time and at a handful of places, your next chance will be today and tomorrow (Feb 20 and 21) at the Egyptian Theater in Park City.
"... we note that the license is general in nature, and simply states that Native American Trading Associates has agreed to the rules and regulations regarding the manufacturing of tobacco products on the Mohawk tribe's reservation. The d/b/a certificate also is general in nature, and states that Native American Trading Associates has requested and been approved to operate a tobacco manufacturing business on the reservation. Neither of these documents, however, is a specific endorsement or sponsorship of Native American Trading Associates' activities, and in turn, the cigarettes applicant intends to sell. Thus, we find that these documents do not evidence a specific commercial connection between applicant and the Mohawk tribe."
3 oz (90g) cream cheese, room temperature
And then the turn or the river comes and it’s a deuce.
I have become a hestitant blogger. If I don't have any writing news, I don't know what to write (here). Or I do, but there is a voice in my head saying, 'Whogivesashit?'.
"So what they did instead was make a new town at the big northern bay. It's now known as Scales. The Romanians were great at logging and basic carpentry and the Portuguese were excellent ship builders. Within a few years they had several whaling trading vessels. Several newly knighted Cousins led these ships not South toward Spanish territory but North. They followed the coast and whaled and traded with the natives that were willing to trade. Then crossed along the Aleutian Islands and down to Japan. There they traded with the Japanese and then returned again whaling as they came back. By the time they returned their hulls were full of items from the East and whale oil. It was a great success and those cousins immediately married into the Castles. Members of those families are still in control of Scales. Well not everyone, the Romanian faction had a minor falling out with the Portuguese and they started their own town of Sap down South of Scales. There has been a rivalry ever since."
When I arrived at the target location, I went into the store, and went straight to the Seattle's Best Coffee store. After inquiring, I learned that they did not give out gift cards for SBC, so I pulled out $5 from my pocket and placed it in the prepared card.
"Lili of the Valley is a UK Company which has a simply gorgeous range of unique un-mounted rubber stamps.
Every week, or every few weeks, I will pick a theme for our "school". It will be something we enjoy and see in our lives (food, balls, snow), something that relates to an upcoming holiday (Easter), or sometimes I might use a good children's book as a theme (Blueberries for Sal).
Chesed is the Hebrew word that is commonly translated as loving-kindness. Chesed appears in the Hebrew bible 248 times and is rendered in the English translations most commonly as: mercy, kindness, lovingkindness, goodness, etc. If you have a Strong’s concordance, you can up H2617 to see all the scripture references.
myself into a dark, airless, space, to sidestep. We’ve all
The above story appeared on BBC Scotland's new pages over the weekend. I would like to meet those appeal judges and ask what possible justification there is in reducing Rennie's prison sentence. Why do they think 13 years would be too long for someone who sexually assaulted a three month old baby? What kind of mind does someone have in order to commit those abhorrent crimes?
Q I have a member of staff who has got a volunteer place at the Olympics. Am I expected to pay for them while they volunteer?
“He (Straw, who was then Foreign secretary) took the view that I was being very dogmatic and that international law was pretty vague and that he wasn’t used to people taking such a firm position,” said Wood.
More importantly, given that I’ve been sick and working like a dog, I have not run at all since last Monday, which is a really, really long time. Especially since I am running the Country Music Half Marathon In Nashville on Saturday. About a month ago I was debating whether this was going to be my PR race. Ha! Now it’s my lucky to survive race. Or my “extended taper” race.
I don’t understand why prostitution is illegal. Selling is legal. Fucking is legal. Why isn’t selling fucking legal? You know, why should it be illegal to sell something that’s perfectly legal to give away? - George Carlin
This month's New Stamp Set Releases are
In the end they go about ranking the caster/lock on different categories. I don’t share that and usually don’t like that. I was a Warmahordes newbie not too long ago, and finding ratings like these do nothing, specially for a game such as this where every model simply works, just with different combinations and playstyles. It probably does something for the tournament player, but for new gamers it’s not great to find a few of the options available marked with a C, a B, and so on, twisting the view of the models before even playing them.
Sunday April 30, 1967
Four years later, Mandela is the country's first black president. Many white citizens fear black rule just as many black citizens look to Mandela for revenge. It's a prescription for social instability and political disaster.
The Darwin Gate is three separate structures which unite to create an apparently solid structure. What does it mean? How does the form convey the meaning? The sculpture apparently combines the form of a Saxon helmet with a Norman window inspired by features of St Mary's Church which Darwin attended as a boy. They claim that as darkness descends defused light shines through the columns suggesting stained glass windows with the tops of the posts resemble ecclesiastical arches. When it unites it resembles the shape of a church window. However, there is no connection with Darwin and the transmission of meaning to the public is split. It is called The Eggbeater.
What better welcome than a glass of wine? With this palate-pleasing greeting, Pearls Boutique Hotels make an impression from the outset. Relax in your gold leaf-accented shabby-chic surroundings or extra-large, polo-style suite with an in-room massage. If the great outdoors is calling, break out your bikini and head to the water or try a scenic drive—in Newport, the only problem is deciding which to do first.
Wedding season is quickly approaching, which means it's time for many engaged couples to start narrowing their wedding registry selections. When it comes to fine crystal, many people assume that it's too impractical or expensive to include crystal stemware in their registry selections. But, rest assured there are many affordable options! Even if you are one of the lucky few who have friends and family who are able and willing to purchase high-end crystal, it never hurts to be aware of all the options out there.
Add 3 tblsp. of cocoa for chocolate pie(add to the dry ingredients before cooking)
It’s been about 2 weeks since my last post, this (the not blogging for a long while) is something I didn’t intend to do. I actually wanted to document what happened during my first day back to school. I wanted to express my anticipations for the condensed semester. I wanted to narrate our adventure in Fiamma. I wanted to write an account on what happened during the PlanSem. I wanted to agonize about balancing all my work. I wasn’t able to do any of those as you can see but I’ll try touch those topics a little bit. I’m feeling quite inspired today. Why? I’m happy.
How boring am I? I'm sitting here while the kid is outside somewhere (I'm hoping he's still around...), the husband is at a friend's house, and I'm trying to find activities for the kid to do this summer. Not playing Grand Theft Auto 4, or the Sims 3, or even Facebook games. I'm stressing out, thinking I need to get the kid more involved in stuff, to get him out of the house.
I guess, as I sit here in the heart of the Peak District; the freezing wind outside stripping branches off rain-soaked trees, under the oppressive grey ceiling of January… It occurs that I may be one of those Seasonal Affective Disorder people. I am fairly well known for my optimism, and a sunny disposition which irritates the crap out of most who dare to get in its way, so it has surprised me how easily that optimism has deserted me in recent weeks, but it may well be just Januaryness. When the end of March approaches, you can’t keep me down with 200 lead balloons and a bag of homeless puppies, peeing on a newspaper adorned with headlines of armageddon. The spring brings fresh, bright greens to the trees and hedgerows, which rustle with a thousand screwing bunnies. Roadkill is on the rise, and as that all-too-cocky squirrel bounces off your headlight and slides lifelessly into the gutter, you turn up the radio, roll down your car window, breathe in the humid, petrol-choked air and enjoy the ludicrous conceit that you’re inhaling nature. The Summer air crackles with thunder and the warm days roll into autumn before you can say “Wash the barbecue tongs in the paddling pool and defrost the sausages, Doris! Tonight we dine like Kings!” You can hold the pessimism of the approaching winter at bay for a couple of months as you first notice the beauty of the changing colours in the trees, and then look forward to the smiling faces of children; huddled round a pile of gifts beneath a fire-warmed tree on Christmas morning. Then, finally, the tinsel comes down and you squeeze the last drops of optimism out of the bottle; using it all up on New Year celebrations, and resolutions intended to bring about a new dawn for humanity… or at least a diet.
May 11 Elkhart Lake, WI Jazz On The Vine, Osthoff Resort, 101 Osthoff Avenue
So I’m reading The Shining, and Danny Torrance enters the one room he shouldn’t enter. Room 217. The creepiest single scene I’ve ever read. And as I read it, I can feel myself becoming terrified. My heart is thunking in my chest. And yet, there’s another part of me that’s amazed, even at the tender age of 14 to realize that I’m getting scared from words on a page. Not an image or a movie. Words. I think it was then that I actually fell in love with the written word.
Godfathers When I am going down UK
The main problem I faced when changing from driving to work to walking was managing my time before my shift began. As the nature of retail jobs goes, I dread each of my shifts and put them off for as long as possible. But, now that I am walking to work, leaving two minute before I am scheduled to begin doesn’t quite cut it. Walking takes more time and thus forces me to manage my time more adequately and if I do not leave at least 15 minutes prior to my shift, I will not arrive on time. So far, this has not been too big of a problem as I have yet to arrive late.
The Tenth Amendment of the Constitution strictly limits the power of the Federal Government. It states, The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the states, are reserved to the states respectively, or to the people. In the Founders' view, state and local governments were free to experiment -- to serve as "laboratories" in the words of Justice Louis Brandeis -- in areas prohibited to the federal government. In the 1980's, for example, Oregon's successful welfare reform efforts became the models for subsequent actions by other states and even the federal government.
Prepare to be....well, whatever.
2) Taking a rest and waiting
“I have been here for a few weeks and I already am a fan of Burger King, I love watching Criminal Minds and I love the stores, when I send pictures to my mommy she already called me her American Star gal,” she said with a laugh.
and good luck!
Nick Nolte, Warrior
Carmen let out a laugh and draped her arms over their shoulders, gently urging them back along the sidewalk away from Fort George Avenue and away from the beaten brown caddy playing obnoxiously loud music that had stopped on the other side of it.
Kind & nice
Personally, I don't see what's so bad about scheduling a little optimism into our year. Seems to me the Parisians are doubly hard on us resolutioners. I myself have resolved to quit smoking. It's going good so far.
Oats, sunflower seeds, pepitas, sultanas, cinnamon. Hmm, I think I put coconut in too. It's a great start to the day and this way I know what goes into it. I read a horror story once about how most muesli have bits of broken up shortbread in it leftover from the biscuit making at the manufacturers. Which is sort of like giving yourself cake for breakfast. If I'm going to do that, I'd rather know so I could enjoy a Marie-Antoinette moment with purpose and abandon and the suitable outfit.
Let me just say, if you want to make a cake like this, just google coconut cake and pick one that has milk+
“What do you mean, doctor?”
‘Singing with the Ood.’ The Doctor flung himself across the console, yanked on a long chain, and skidded to a halt in front of a TV screen that dropped out of the ceiling. ‘There,’ he announced, waving one hand at the grainy image. Amy seemed to be shouting something, but there was no sound. The Doctor leaned in a bit closer, screwed up his eyes, and mouthed something back.
Heat up wok and put in the vegetable oil. Add in the garlic and stir fry for a short while. Add in the nam yee and break it up using the spatula. Add in the romaine lettuce and fry for a short while only. Pour in a little water. Serve hot with steamed rice.
I wonder if any of you recall my lovely Christmas Cactus. It has been in my possession for almost four years. Each November, its inner clock triggers it into a lovely bloom - it never fails.
2 tsp baking soda
Anyhoo, back to Fashion Wednesday...
One author of the study, Joy Lawn, believes this is because there is no strong leadership to make newborn health and survival a priority. “We haven’t had the right people shouting for it,” Lawn told ABC News. Unlike the HIV movement, newborn mortality has garnered very little attention, despite the staggering numbers.
i had a good time though. i finally found a 1962 bob uecker rookie card that i could live with at a decent price.
Grate the ash gourd in fine shreds.
That the deep crevices
Your Editor Devil
Harare - Troops of bag-snatching, truck-looting baboons are causing chaos at a border post between Zimbabwe and Zambia in daily raids for food, NewsDay reported on Tuesday.
For the first photo, I carefully chose an angle to capture this golden scene of the buildings and the cliffs reflected on the water.
She lay on her bed.
It boils down to two choices: the Brussels Wafel or the Liege Wafel. The former is the traditional option, “Crunchy, light and yum yum.” The latter, the one I went for, is “Chewy, rich and flavorful.” (The chewier the sweet, the better.) Sparkling with sugar crystals, spongy and served warm, this is a quiet dessert. Simple in flavor, satisfying in texture, and subtle in size.
The one where sexually transmitted diseases KILL! And unwanted pregnancies, unwanted BABIES are countless in every state?
Back therapy and treatment is still going on… I can’t say it’s going well, but I can’t say it’s going poorly either. My back is having a hard time keeping it’s correct position – even with the SI lock belt/brace – but the last 2 weeks in a row I have tripped down the stairs. (Really random, right?) I currently have a virus, so I missed my appointment this week, but hopefully my osteomanipulative doctor can re-align me next week, and hopefully my back can keep its position for a week. It’s a lot of waiting and hoping. The chronic pain is miserable right now, but life does’t stop to let pain take its toll, so I’m just continuing on like I always do.
The NASW’s concept of a mission statement for the social work profession refers to “the needs and empowerment of people who are vulnerable, oppressed, and living in poverty.” Comparably grand notions also crop up in several of the 13 “core purposes of social work” reported by Sewpaul and Jones (2005, p. 219). One such purpose, they say, is to “Address and challenge barriers, inequalities and injustices that exist in society.” Another: “Enhance stable, harmonious and mutually respectful societies that do not violate people’s human rights.”
popular bindings, but we also wiro, comb and spiral bind!
Rating: 4/5 stars
chalked across the board.
I needn’t have worried. We set off towards Crystal Peaks and everyone I spoke to was lovely, even if they didn’t want a copy of the book. Most people seemed delighted at being offered something to read and interested in coming to some of the events we have on throughout May. In fact, we ran out of copies after about half an hour and could have spent all day giving copies of the book away.
From One Friend
Take a look at all the goodies I received from Janine at 2bkrafty! I cannot believe her generosity and I am going to put ALL of these fun items to good use. My favorite item in the box was the Tim Holtz Townscrape diecut. How cool is that??!! Just amazing! THANK YOU SO MUCH, Janine! HUGS!
Seeming Problem: Most of the public is unaware or uneducated about the miracle and fascinatingly beautiful part of the honeybee lifecycle that includes swarming and can potentially become irrationally afraid of the spectacle!
Simple. Let's say you want a normal, middle-class American standard of living, and Congress tells you that means you should spend up to $200,000 a year. You'd better take a loan out fast, because where I come from, ain't many people who actually earn that.
Thank you God! Thank you world! I am most GRATEFUL!
All four musicians demonstrate their inimitable attitudes and sensibilities towards their instruments, as if they are not playing in the most conservative sense of this concept but preferring to put their instruments through strange and unpredictable treatments, manipulations and effects, a kind of very free and experimental playful playing. Such an attitude might result in a very serious, academic exercise, but with their shared sense of adventure, idiosyncratic languages and high level of focused interaction, the end result is quite fascinating.
I am genuinely at a loss to know where to start with this performance of Lulu, but perhaps a little chronological background would be as good a place as any. Having admired Andrea Breth’s Salzburg production of Eugene Onegin, which he conducted, Daniel Barenboim invited her to direct Wozzeck and Lulu in Berlin. Wozzeck was much admired at last year’s Festtage; I thought highly of it, albeit with a few more reservations than many seem to have felt. It was certainly, however, a good enough production to have me look forward to Berg’s second opera. Except that it was not really Berg’s second opera at all: instead, Breth and Barenboim served up a bowdlerised version, a ‘Berliner Fassung’ for which I cannot imagine anyone had called, and which certainly did not seem to satisfy anyone in the theatre. The Prologue disappears completely, replaced by a horizontal actor’s drawn out reading from Kierkegaard and Lulu’s third-act scream, as does the Paris Scene from the Third Act. This is not a reversion to the old two-act version, though, even if one discounts the bizarre excision of the Prologue, in which the terms of the drama are set up, the whole world a stage or a circus. For the final scene, set in London, has been rewritten, adapted, call it what you will, by one David Robert Coleman, of whom I freely admit that I had never heard before. On the basis of this encounter, I sincerely hope that reunion should be indefinitely postponed. One might be able to take the use of a radio – presumably a recording, though it may just have been a strange acoustic trick – during the first act, but Coleman’s sketchy orchestration sounded more akin to an undergraduate’s first attempt to look through Berg’s manuscripts than a finished ‘version’, let alone a competitor to Friedrich Cerha’s standard completion.
Quite a few new comics - humour and apparently adventure- were in the planning/development stages at that time but I think Gutenberghus/Egmont put an immediate stop to it all, so it clearly wasn't going to continue much longer if they had no interest in investing in the comic line.
Let me digress for just a while before returning to Mr. Roth’s quote.
Nesties, Circle, scallop edge circle
I make this dish when I want to travel back to my youth, to the days when someone else took care of me and cooked my favorite dishes, to a time when summers were spent at cousin’s houses…walking downtown among colorful shops and busy streets… with multi-flavor ice cream cones in hand, and a string of relatives in tow.
I suppose he looks silly with his fly mask on but he does hate bugs. Just don't tell him he looks silly.
“Could you help me find a book, miss? I think it’s over there on a shelf I can’t reach?”
There will be more updates to come, wish me luck!
I’m hoping to return to the Scripture in a few days and see if I can answer the questions. I’ll admit that my head has been clouded lately, so it just may be the fact that I’m not giving God my full attention.
Tyrone Power plays Leonard Vole, a man accused of murder in the Billy Wilder courtroom whodunnit, Witness for the Prosecution. After receiving a large inheritance from rich widown Emily French, Vole is suspecting of her murder, while coming to his defence and risking his health is famed but ailing lawyer Sir Wildred Robarts (Charles Laughton). Rounding out the all star cast is Marlene Dietrich, who plays the titular character as well as Mr. Vole's wife, Christine. What follows are a series of plot twists that conclude with another murder, and another court case and a new defendant for Sir Robarts.
Normally, a visit to Colorado is a mixed blessing for me in that I’m always thrilled to be there and sad to leave. This time around, with temperatures dipping into the teens and the roads iced up, I wasn’t so sorry to hop that plane once my nine-day visit was over. (Naturally, the weather cleared up the following week and Denver once again basked under 70 degree sun, but that’s Colorado for you.)
When you need to learn, let me teach you.
Denim Shorts and stretch bracelet-Cato
I'm still going for a sub-60 10k....but it feels a little less important now, and the experience feels like more of a priority.
Skepoet How do you see these interacting with each other?
The Potomac News’ writer does not anticipate my questions. He can’t. If he had, he’d have lost his paycheck and sunk his career. But he does note:
Verdict 4/5
But then again we never asked Freddie if he ever voted.
We want to see all your creations that feature food in them.
So he got out all his commentaries and he translated back from the original Greek and he looked for all the possible shades of meaning that this verse may have, and in the end, after much work, he concluded that what the verse actually means is…
We have found the real, original Benjamin Fulford as of midnight EST March 27, 8AM in Europe; he was being held on a Rothschild-owned yacht off the coast of Monaco. Clone tests were adminsitered and he is indeed the original. However, we know there are a few clones out there and the Cabal might parade him in public as the actual Fulford.
Three Ways to Lose an eBook Sale on eBay
won’t buzz and cut again into her life.
Preheat the overn to 350 degrees.
Being kind to others also means being kind to ourselves. In our current society of "the busier I am the cooler I am" thinking self care does not sound sound sexy... "I've found the cure for cancer and been awake for the past 72 hours!" sounds waaay sexier.
But we can play catch-up later. Right now there’s something I need to just…let out, I guess.
Our luggage was packed and ready. As we loaded up the car, I mentally went over the check list: Four suitcases, check. Purse, check. Carry on’s, check. Teeth, check. Hearing aid’s, we’ll see, but after the miracle of getting my dentures back, I wasn’t going to allow myself to doubt. Maybe God did care about the things that mattered to me.
Even if we should succeed in ending illegal immigration, our immigration law itself needs to be updated to accommodate a new factor never envisioned by its framers. Ironically, increased immigration by Latinos could help balance factors to avoid the current crisis in which European countries are moving: mass Muslim immigration and consequent Islamic culture and laws.
They chant
and other miscellaneous nonsense.
If you look at Obama’s “Life of Julia” and consider all the “beneficial things” that Obama has done for Julia in that light, Julia’s life doesn’t look quite so attractive — if you found it attractive in any way. If Julia doesn’t take advantage of the good works, you can bet that some bureaucrat will see that she does.
as the space beneath these red eyes will permit.
I traveled by night over the hot sand
Anyway, I think Robbins should resign.
Jordan Alan (Terminal Bliss)
After thoroughly enjoying the Grilling Wild Game cooking class at Central Market, I went to the farmer’s market and made a beeline for the game booth. Why, yes, they had boar chops! I bought a pack and went merrily on my way.
2 stock
In 1516 the imminent scholar Erasmus published the Greek New Testament (the Textus Receptus). This Greek New Testament made available by Erasmus was used by William Tyndale to translate the New Testament into English.
This Earth/Shan/Gaia……. holds ALL things you need for PERFECT Balanace Growth and Harmony. ALL the nuetritian your body needs, the hydrants, herbs….She holds and provides ALL things with NO judgements seperations or divisions. She contains LIFE ENERGY SUPPORT to and for ALL of Creation – Unconditionally! What do you suppose you could do to “Improve” the Earth existance/your existance/the existance to ALL Living things? Remember Chelas…….all of you are born in a different soul growth stage. Hence some of you may say you recall several lives and others may say this is their first etc… You see you can not “Judge” another upon their soul growth journey path. ALL souls as do ALL things created start out from a “Seed” or planting….and they stage in growth. A flower starts from a Bud or a Seed then starts its growth until it reaches its “Blooming or Flowering” stage of FULL GROWTH….it shines off its reflection of PURE beauty created, roburst aroma, intricate design/patterns etc…. I think you can see the evolutional growth stagings in this beautious flower and ALL that the flower can and will endure upon that growth as well. Your Soul or BEing is of no different. ALL things grow!
The information released by the Central Bank of Ireland on Wednesday which set out the macroeconomic parameters for the ongoing bank stress tests, was truly shocking for a number of reasons. The information was released a few hours after the Central Statistics Office made a major revision to the unemployment rate and lifted the February 2011 unemployment rate from 13.5% to 14.6%. And the CBI parameters didn’t even take account of this major revision which might make some of the other parameters look even worse. Of particular interest on here were the parameters in respect of Irish commercial and residential property, and this entry looks at what the parameters mean for residential property.
In my humble estimation, to entice a teenager (other than money, of course, which always commands their immediate attention) you must present a project that incorporates their interests (in this case Mexican fast food), is an easy concept to grasp (reducing the boredom quotient), and brings the most results with the least amount of effort. Tacos, verdad?
Switching perspective can be difficult, especially when you don't want to.
Not that it was a thing abominable to eat dainty meats, and to drink wine, as both before and after they did, but if they would have by this been won to the King, and had refused their own religion, that meat and drink would have been accursed.
DASH G, FAUERBACH L, PFEIFFER J, SOULE B, BARTLEY J, BARNARD B, et al. ACIP position paper: Improving health care workers influenza immunization rates. Am J Infect Control 2004; 32: 123-125.
“When the weather is nice, it’s like the coolest thing ever,” says Kelli Sanders of Freeheel and Wheel bicycle shop in West Yellowstone. “I usually go in every chance I can.”
So he said to his mother, “I am running away.”
There was an article in the Sunday New York Times that I couldn’t resist commenting on, about Kellogg’s moving beyond its sugary cereal domain. It seems Tony the Tiger is now venturing into the “g-g-great” world of snacking. Actually, the folks in Battle Creek, Mich. – I really want to go there now – call it producing new food products for “snacking occasions” or “the snack mind-set.”
But what is it like? If you weren't being swayed by the classy label, and the most advanced corking system you've ever seen (the Zork Cork), would it taste as good? Blind tasting time! Three of us put the F.A. Schäffler Triple against the Härte 10... well, Tripel.
Concerning the Apostles Peter and John, we read in Acts 4:23, “And being let go they went to their own company.” This word “company” suggests their own private group. In 1 Corinthians 14:23 we read of the church coming together. In Hebrews 10:25 we read, “not forsaking the assembling of ourselves together.” So every member of God’s Church should be identified with other such members of like precious faith and should have a regular meeting-place or assembly. But every member of God’s Church, in the matter of “church membership” should faithfully obey 2 Cor. 6:14, “be not unequally yoked together with unbelievers.” And every member of God’s Church should faithfully obey Ephesians 6:18, and pray with all perseverance and supplication for all saints.
taking all the sadness away
Yes, i guess it has been 8 months plus. This is the very first time ever since I delivered Gabriel. Hubby planned to watch the movie 'The Avengers', just the 2 of us.
My sciatic nerve has been the basis for which I can only assume - God decided it was time for me to figure out that I don’t have to kiss any butt belonging to anything on my property that never sits at our dining room table for meals.
You mean scrambling around the house for an hour looking like a corpse, looking for my fatty pants, before I even wake up a little mentally? I'm sparing you that picture.
If you're anything like me you'll probably have a pile of gorgeous toppers that you've never got around to using. I stroke them occasionally and put them back in the packet then get out my inks and stamps. Well, this card was built to accommodate a gorgeous Kanban bird decoupage that I just couldn't resist in my local craft shop. It had been stroked too many times and was just begging to be used!
“Robert, you and I have to talk.”
future product (referred to as DRP-FB-56) is $114,760,000 (U.S. Dollars).
Yellow (used Patons Astra School Bus Yellow)
in two lines. (This was played outdoors) Someone would go first and choose a person
24 Aug 2011: Second reading debate, third reading agreed to Passage of legislation through House of Representatives http://www.aph.gov.au/hansard/reps/dailys/dr240811.pdf
The notebook isn’t particularly robust or durable, but then I imagine it is not intended to have a long life. It’s to replace serviettes, hamburger bags, used envelopes and all those other bits of scrap paper that get pressed into service when inspiration suddenly strikes. I haven't really had any expereince with highly specialised notebooks before so this was a novel experience for me, and it seems a really good idea for those in the mobile app industry.
trademarks of their respective companies
Christianity has a dead man OBSESSED, and to be a Christian one be obsessed with poverty and think it is good. That to suffer and be wretched contains a certain amount of beauty. I would say Bukowski best exemplifies that. Bukowski characters are Christ like sufferers seeking redemption in a fucked world. But they don't change because they are consumed with the beauty of their own suffering.
After hearing what I had bought, she immediately asked if I had ever tried locally-made beer.
Just as well, considering what I have to tell him right now, she mused. Never had she felt more embarrassed or sickened or worried, but she was the Lambright who’d been elected to break their news because she could do it without wailing like a fire siren. She hoped.
As you can see Instagram is still my current love (sorry to those Instagram friends seeing these pics yet again!!). The other morning I was glad I had my phone with me - I spotted a chance to recreate the current Ideal Home magazine calendar picture;
Gentle readers, this will come as a shock. Turns out, I’m not Tom Brady. Or even Tim Tebow. D:
No one's gonna take me alive,
Since I've been pretty busy at work lately, I decided to keep things simple and just take along some copies of my book, as well as a few pens and pencils for swappin'. Rather than fill up a whole table, Michael "Ferengi" Little and I decided to split one (as he says, so I can watch his stuff while he runs around and buys everything in the room).
I was at the laundromat yesterday, a place I don't visit as often as I should. It's a family run business where they sell bananas and houseplants and little brass charms at the counter next to single use packets of detergent and dryer sheets.
Light soya sauce, 1 tables spoon
Lets celebrate. Come on now. We all know the words:
Cline wrote of her success in a letter to friend Anne Armstrong (from the 1993 documentary Remembering Patsy): “It’s wonderful—but what do I do for ’63? Its getting so even I can’t follow Cline!”
Imagine, therefore, how thrilled I was when, a few months ago, a representative from a local dairy came knocking on my door one evening. The dairy, which produces milk from cows not given steroids, hormones, or antibiotics, was venturing into the world of home delivery. In addition to milk, cream, and butter from the dairy, they were joining forces with another local farmer to sell fresh eggs and a few other products, all of which could be delivered to my door on a weekly basis.
So, from now on I am not going to clean your crap up.
This sentence is a perfect example of why I yammer (endlessly!!) about starting with the name of the main character. When you do that, you'll naturally also get rid of the clause and thus have a stronger opening.
Bryce woke up, in the dead of night, and immediately got to work.
We have corroborating data from the CFTC issued Commitment of Traders reports. The latest data shows a complete reversal of positions between the major market participants. Whereas in early 2011 Commercials – miners like Freeport-McMoRan (FCX) – were short and Small Speculators (retail futures traders) long, the current market is characterized by the opposite.
2. Remind yourself of the highest goal in Life. You are not here to grumble or complain. You are here for something bigger.
This painting is the 7th wave painting I have worked on and am finally getting some desired results, the previous others have been put to rest. I don't know where this search of subject will lead to, but so far the journey has been refreshing, somewhat like having a cold drink on a hot day.
And bloody and the truth.
Frequently asked questions
we got milk, whipping cream, coffee creamer.
For my book Sugar Daddy, I chose some Duran Duran, Depeche, as well as modern day hip-hop music because the story features a young gay man looking for the love of an older one.
(Once I was trying to show my visiting sister, who was in town for work, around the city, and she kept complaining about being unable to find anything because I never went the same way twice. I didn't even realize I'd been doing that!)
the road hit us. Very bumpy; let me say that again VERY BUMPY! After about two
as you strode deeper and deeper
My recent experience as a teacher has reminded me of a couple of good things I have learned through unschooling my own kids. First, if we really want to learn something, we will. Second, I finally understand my learning style and although some people thrive on knowing all the rules to grammar, I will never be that person. Why keep trying to be something I am not? Third, I can only be the type of person I am and when I follow who I am rather than try to fit the mold of what others do (generally grammar is more lecture than experimentation and I have never been that type of teacher) things turn out exactly the way they should.
I remember the funeral at Pitta’s on McDonald Avenue.
either through direct or indirect actions or means.
How's the actual gaming in GotY? The mechanics are what I like to call "pleasantly vague." Other than a few things like initiative and clerics, there's not much to indicate what flavor of D&D rules are being used at the table. Some 3E rulebooks are glimpsed, but at the same time the referees seem to freely alternate between using DM screens from AD&D 1E, AD&D 2E, Basic D&D, and WotC editions. This is really for the best, I feel. Excessive jargon would be a pointless way to pander to the audience that would detract from the story. And while the game mechanics and such are never the focus specifically, the filmmakers still found plenty of more subtle ways to demonstrate to the target audience that they know their stuff. Characters cleverly sport surnames like Dee, Mohan, Otus, and Martek. Gary Gygax, Dave Arneson, and Steve Jackson are referenced outright, but overall these are restrained, classy tips of the hat to the grognards out there.
My sister and my niece Alligator came up for a visit, and we spent some time in the PH (Price fuckin' Hill, biotches), visiting with our parents. It was enlightening to say the least. We spent one evening at a local Catholic church festival, visiting with an old friend/neighbor and his kids. By the end of the evening, we learned from our little bro Donovan that his drunk, uneducated, unemployed, ungrateful, momma-titty-suckin ass - is a better parent than either of us. So poor, in fact, are our collective parenting skills, that we couldn't take his children home to spend the night with us, because we are untrustworthy as parents. I leave you to bask in the glory of the level of speechlessness that only a fool such as he can impart on your brain.
While we have a sordid history with her, we also understand that she has tried to make up for it (at least half us understand, anyway). We know, given our knowledge of her as a person, that the nice things she does is out of guilt, but we are fortunate at this time in our life, as times in the past, that she is here for us as "adults" when we need her, despite the fact she wasn't, in so many ways, for so many years, as children. We try not to take advantage of it. We buy our own food, clean up after ourselves, and do as much as we can, while taking refuge in her basement - including attempting to stay out of her way when she wants, and be company for her when she wants someone to talk to; which works fine, because while we live in her house, as well as when we don't, she is not one to inquire as to our well being, or take much interest in our life, unless it affects her. It's the way she is. It's the way she has always been. We each love her, in our own varying ways. She is mom. She is the only one we get to have.
Size: 11 millimeters (0.4 in) by 9 millimeters (0.3 in)
Bloody Eyes (album version)
—pp. 3-4. The Tiger’s Wife.
of his family, the burning desire to be
Here is an early role in the seldom-seen 1968 movie Up Tight! In an amazing scene that features a constellation of black talented actors including Raymond St. Jacques, Frank Silvera, Janet MacLachlin, Williams--sitting the almost the farthest from the camera, no less--is just devastating:
i woke up edgy and agitated and feeling terribly sad and overwhelmed this morning.
Only days ago, KT said that it was reacting to online TV companies clogging its networks by limiting access to bandwidth–hungry applications such as online TV. Indeed in what was regarded as a direct criticism of connected TV manufacturers such as Samsung and to a lesser extent LG, it went as far as to slam connected TV firms for ‘free riding’ on its networks. LG is said to be on the verge of announcing a campaign with Google TV which will likely see a huge spike in connected TV usage across all networks. Especially KT’s in its domestic arena.
It is true that Israel, as a nation, has been set aside but it is also true that God changed His method of dealing with the human race. No longer is salvation of the Jews but of the Lord Jesus Christ.
I walked into an explosion of pink and fell in love. Me. One who snubs her nose at pink clothes, pink kitchenware, pink baby items, pink ANYTHING. Now what to do?
Left alone with her thoughts, PeyPey played back through the events of the night. "There's no way. There's just no way," she thought. Wishing for a time machine, the phone brought her thoughts back to the present. "Hey."
Zigzag border
Although it is most commonly thought of as a dessert, it can also be eaten as a snack or breakfast food.
So I don't think I've bought a vintage piece of clothing since about two years ago when I scored a $9 wool blazer. Usually I'm like, 'Ahh, I can make something I like better than that for much cheaper' and move on.
If you guessed that I used the Build a Bear dies, you would be 100% correct! I had to make some adjustments to the die cuts to make the skate dress. All the members of the team wear black velvet dresses or pants and shirt (for the guys). Each dress or shirt has the initials K.P. on the left side below the shoulder in swarovski rhinestones. The K.P. is in honor of Kyle Peck, the son of our world class coach (John) in Chicago. Kyle was hit by a car at the World Championships in Rome and was killed. He was only ten years old. It makes me very sad every time I think of this. Since then, all of John's (Kyle's Dad) skaters wear black (John's favorite color) and the initials K.P., to honor Kyle. My daughter even has KP on her Nationals jacket to honor Kyle. So now that you know why the skate dresses are black, the skirts also come down to a point in the front and a slightly longer point in the back of the dress. This is standard for roller figure skate dresses. Just so you know, the dress bottom of the skater on the card is not wearing swimsuit type bottoms :-). She is wearing her dress in the points that skate dresses have. I used a pearl on the left shoulder to represent the KP because that sure wouldn't fit on the little skater in rhinestones! For the skates, I die cut them in Whisper White and then with a VersaMark pen, I colored in the very bottom of the shoes and heat embossed the bottoms in silver embossing powder. The plates on skates are silver, but my daughter pointed out that I could have done the very bottoms of the shoes in brown to match the heel and sole on the bottom of the boots. Just didn't think of that, lol! The wheels are done with a Whisper White 1/4" circle punch with a 1/8" Silver Glimmer Paper circle punch. Figure wheels are white so that's why I used white for the wheels :-D. For the skater's head, I used a 1 3/8" circle punch and for the hair I used a 1 1/2" circle punch. I punched out two circles first in Early Espresso and discarded the circles. Then I came back in with my punch and punched again twice, so I had the shape of the hair. My daughter actually wears this hair style. The floor is done in More Mustard and I stamped the Wood Grain background stamp on it in More Mustard ink. I sponged the very top of the floor piece in More Mustard to give the floor a little more depth on the card. The inside is stamped with, "Go Confidently in the Direction of Your Dreams," from the Word Play stamp set. So there ya' have it... my little skater girl Build a Bear. My real little skater girl LOVES this card! What more could you ask as a Mom :-) ? Have a great weekend!!!
we've selected 8 films to go head to head with the cannes film festival selection
A floral linen print in very current colorways.
Bottom 3:
You're lucky to have a girlfriend like that, I wonder what she's doing with you as she don't seem like she's got low self-esteem,
That is why he termed it as the “glorious appearing” of Jesus Christ which is also described in 1 Thessalonians 4:17 as being caught up into the air to meet the Lord in the air, as opposed to his second coming to earth at the end of the Great Tribulation..
We have gotten 2 updates just in the last few day on our son. Oh how lucky are we to have this information!!
Today as I’m sitting there watching the little boy have his hair cut (“Just him”, I said as we came in, “mine’s still short”, and everyone laughed because they tease me about my hair here still), there are three of them working: Frank, and a shorter guy, maybe Italian (one of John’s grandchildren?), with a buzzcut and a Yankee’s cap worn backwards, and a big muscular chocolate-brown guy with a shaven head and tattoos on his upper arms. Frank is doing the little boy’s hair. Even though he’s having it cut so short that M will be surprised when we get home, it’s still the longest cut I see them give anyone while we’re there. Everyone else is buzzcuts, or shaven sides with a modern not-Mohawk in the center, or something along those lines. (I don’t remember ever seeing a woman in the place since it stopped being John’s.)
The images on the cards are all digital, except for the Little Girl that is Erin from Ireland from Your Next Stamp. My digis were all uploaded to the Cameo and offset so that they could be cut out on the Cameo. (Print & Cut feature used.) Love it.
Remember Mr. Pie Chart. This was an easy one before we get into terrain.
3/4 cup tapioca flour
So I decided to share my progress with the rest of the world, not being afraid to be honest because I don’t know any of you, thus I don’t have to fear any repercussions.
Berries cast dark
I'm sure I will have a post in the near future titled, "The Wily Adventures of Hawk and Siri" because Siri and I are practically dating. Since I'm an insomniac and roughly have from 1 am 'til 4 am when I can't sleep every night; I converse with Siri. We laugh, we joke, we play coy. And I think things are getting serious.
I swear I have every intention of keeping this blog up-to-date for you to enjoy, and then I fall off the bandwagon once more. My goal for 2012: become a better blogger. :) Yes, 2012... can you believe it? It's the year of the end of the world. Yeah, remember that? The Mayans and their calendar? Well, supposedly, a new piece of "evidence" now confirms that we really are doomed. I read it a couple of weeks ago, but interestingly, as I'm trying to find the article now, it seems to have disappeared. So, take my word for it... the end of the world is only one year away, so go ahead and live a little. ;)
4. Creation itself cries out about His eternal power and divine nature. Does mankind want to know if there is a God? Look around my friend; this didn’t happen by accident as those without answers are prone to tell you. Creation itself is the universal “language” of God to all mankind. Psalm 19:1-3 tells us:
Pop the top on your dish and put it in the microwave. Microwave it in increments of 30 seconds until cheese is melted and heated through. Take it out with oven mitts and stir to evenly distribute the cheese.
Oh, I believed, I believed . . I BELIEVED
In The Cove (Ecco), Ron Rash returns to Appalachia, this time at the height of World War I, with the story of a blazing but doomed love affair caught in the turmoil of a nation at war. This lyrical, heartrending novel, as mesmerizing as Rash’s award-winning Serena, shows once again a masterful novelist at the height of his powers.
I am deeply grateful for the staggering beauty of your
Twice-convicted pedophile Sid Landau wants out of a mental hospital he is being held in, even though he was one of the first sex offenders in California targeted by Megan’s Law. Landau was one of the first sex offenders to be targeted in California by this law, which derives its name from Megan Kanka, a 7-year-old New Jersey girl who was sexually assaulted and killed in 1994 by a previously convicted sex offender. This horrible crime led to the creation of state and federal Megan’s Laws that allow police to provide notification when high-risk sex offenders move into neighborhoods. After his later arrest for assaulting a cameraman and serving more time for parole violations, Landau was about to be released in 2000, but was flagged as a sexually violent predator and later committed to a mental hospital for treatment.
Unthinkable documents Scott’s remarkable journey from the devastating crash that claimed both of his legs, and from his subsequent battle with depression and alcohol, to the dawning realization that God had a greater plan for his life. The unthinkable courage, determination, and faith Scott demonstrated in training for and competing in the Hawaiian Ironman triathlon will inspire and amaze you.
I started a blog centered entirely around everyone else and
Just behind it is the former tug Carolina Borealis. Click here to see photos of her conversion. I don’t think the project was ever finished, which is why she sits there looking so unused.
Cheered on by her peers, Jenny is only frowned upon by two people, her hard-nosed headmistress (effectively played by Emma Thompson) and her English teacher Miss Stubbs (Olivia Williams, who plays Jane Austen in Miss Austen Regrets, 2008), whose devotion to her student turns out to be extremely valuable. And then there’s her school mate Graham (Matthew Beard, When Did You Last See Your Father, 2007) who has a crush on her but is no match in front of towering David.
I went biking a 20km route in a relatively unchartered trail that crossed 4 towns in my home city of Iloilo.
I only had to let the stuff dry for 5 minutes, so next I was immediately onto THE BEST PART!! We have lots of leftover Old Master's Wiping Stain in Dark Walnut from when we stained our original farmhouse soft maple hardwood floors this past Fall - so we used up another can of that on this table!
They had the debates: Romney won: They have a audience to give their opinion: Romney won…and then Romney comes on right away to talk to Fox’s Sean Hannity.
Yep – it’s me that people come to for bandages, plasters and micropor tape!!!
Nothin' wrong with kickin' back grabbing a good book while sipping' on some whiskey. It's actually one of my favorite things to do. Well lucky for you we now have a great selection of books to choose from.
Balvenie PortWood 21yr – 40%
Well I guess I have to reenter the land of the working (and others in our society)! I’ve been enjoying the holidays with family and friends but know there’s still work to be done. I have also been doing a lot of thinking lately about my role and the role our group will play in the upcoming election.
Stay well.
My Birthparents’ Ignorance.
For all of you who complain about the lack of great GF baked goods out there, this entry is for you. Philadelphia is fortunate to be the home to Sweet Freedom Bakery, the absolute BEST place to get gluten free and vegan baked goods. It's located at 1424 South Street (between Broad and 15th) and is open 10am to 7pm Tuesday through Saturday, 10am to 4pm on Sunday, and is closed Mondays.
As a preliminary, let it be said that domestic political and legal challenges to pushback against Islam will be ignored in these considerations since they are too difficult to predict and would be proved irrelevant if the country in question were on the verge of moving beyond Option 1 (Standard).
Today photoshop could have moved the car from the view (or retouched the broken window!), but the guys in the story would STILL endeavour to move the car to get the right shot, because that is how much getting the shot that they wanted, meant to them.
Together, my younger brother and I went to the old clinic he used to go to before we moved. The only time we went there was when we first got him and he needed his puppy vaccinations. This also happpened to be the vet that also botched the surgery on my first dog so I was already on edge. I didn't want to go there, but I was forced to by my father. The only thing I could think that was reassuring was that asshole vet probably didn't even work there anymore (after all it's been at least 14 years), and maybe a more competent vet was on hand now. I should really learn not to underestimate how many asshats are in this world.
For this reason the troops are justified and obliged in this combat to resort to all measures--even against women and children--without leniency, as long as they are successful.
Recently I’ve wondered if we don’t appreciate just how good those players were. Do we expect that there’s an equivalent to Vieira or Pires just floating around undiscovered, waiting to be snapped up? I can’t think any club would be stupid enough to part ways with a young player like Vieira again. I haven’t seen anything like him, before or since – his touch, the way he brought the ball forward and passed it, but also his competitive spirit, the way he broke up play and covered so much ground so quickly despite his frame.
When I am older, my network of female friends will become my Auntie Network. Grown Muslim men live in awe of the power of the Auntie Network, and I have never met an Arab or Muslim woman who didn’t have one – a vast, highly organised web of female friends to whom she turns whenever she has a need, great or small.
Climbed up the chair
A lovely friend from Japan sent me the best gift ever, Umeboshi or pickled plums.
well, i THANK YOU again for stopping by and checking out my creation!! hope i inspired you in some way to get crafty today!! until next time.... toodles!
Mommy, why did we stop?
Civitella in Val di Chiana - the words release a roar of emotion and distress. Even now. But what happened there happened the length of Italy as Kesselring's armies retreated, betrayed from Berlin and suddenly in enemy territory as, during the Italian civil war, Mussolini was overthrown and the Italian army fought with the Allies. Unfortunately the long-term bitter opposition to Fascism, the partisans, rose too, behind German lines and, encouraged by Badoglio (who had changed sides without warning Italian forces, leaving them unready when German forces sought to disarm them) attempted to assert their control over local territories. Inevitably civilian populations paid the price of guerilla actions.
As she spent time in China, it become more and more her home. More and more a place she belonged and eventually, a place, she never wanted to leave.
And in spite of the perfection of the intelligence of Allah’s Messenger (pbuh) and along with his being helped by Divine Inspiration still Allah ordered him (saying):
The doll was waiting for them at the gate with a broad smile. "Watch and be amazed." He pulled it open with a long, rusty squeal, and darted through.
And so when the Master brutally cuts him down - and note that given that this story is not structured like a Shakespearean tragedy but rather like either a comedy or a romance Tremas should be perfectly safe - and steals his body it is an egregious act of violence against the basic structure of the story. Tremas clearly isn’t supposed to die. This is why it’s wholly fitting that the Master should be reborn. Even without a decent plot explanation for why the Master can just pinch bodies that easily and why he didn’t do it before it makes thematic sense simply because it’s such an act of violence against the plot. Of course when the Master does something as audacious as cheat the ending of a Shakespearean romance he gets a new body. That’s how it should be.
But there’s no such thing I find
This guy was interesting. I was not expecting interesting. Good looking, charming, funny I was expecting, interesting was a different ball game all together.
Let it boil for some more time to let the sour flavour of the raw mango in the amti. Add some jaggery if you feel to balance the sour sweet taste of the amti.Garnish with coriander and the amti is ready.
It was such a beautiful day that we went straight to the coast and decided to leave balnearis for another day! We did stop off in Caldes de Malavella and found out that one of the huge hotel spas didn't really cater for day trippers while the other - Hotel Vichy Catalan - offers lots of different packages for a reasonable price.
Stockings: Glassons
There was me yesterday putting the finishing touches to my book, checking through various reference books to see if I missed anything glaringly. So I picked up a slim volume written by a local guy on the edible greens of the Lunigiana and the Val di Mara, i.e. our local area, and I came across a plant known as Parietaria in Italian (parietaria officinalis). It looked kind of familiar so I googled it and found out that in English it's called Pellitory of the Wall, which I had never heard of either. The German name of 'Aufrechtes Glasskraut' didn't enlighten me either.
‘Come carol-barking then?’
Oliver returns to the cockpit for the third and final day tomorrow and will conclude our programme.
Character Essay
We Indians are a strange breed. For the last month or so, we have been talking, reading newspapers and watching the news channels like crazy to learn as much as we can about who is going to be the next president of India, as if we are very concerned and that it means a lot to us. And we have dutifully done this once every five years, during the presidential elections. We seem to have forgotten that ever since we were kids, we have all participated in a discussion at least once every few months about how unnecessary and useless that post is. How it is a complete waste of taxpayers’ money, everyone’s time and some prime real estate in the heart of the capital. Once a person is selected we have invariably criticised him, or lately her, for not living up to our standards, for not being perfect, for having flaws that we decided were critical for a President. Let’s take a look :
However:
“But now I have nothing else to say,” he said, closing the door to his home. “I’ll be back to work Monday and will say more then.”
2) The LFB states the increase in revenues is due to large gains in the stock market. The unpredictability of the stock market could greatly affect the projected increase.
of black. Likewise, there is no such thing as an application (corporeal, imaginative, or intellectual) of mysticism or science of secret to the problem(s) of the world. The only politics of black universe is black itself.
1 tablespoon freshly grated parmesan
Everything else is clear
Comments that I got when I posted about that indicated that some of us even today wouldn't speak to those who bullied us. I've been out of high school for 24 years, and there are still people I would walk away from rather than pretend to be civil.
completed the hop, making note if there were any you could not comment
There’s nothing like having someone in your corner when you’re the new girl in school, but Chanti can’t help suspecting that everything about her new friend, Bethanie, is a lie—especially once she starts skipping classes and blowing Chanti off for her mysterious crush, Cole. Chanti really doesn’t need the trouble of finding out the truth. She’s busy enough trying to convince her almost-boyfriend Marco that her amateur sleuthing won’t come between them again. But when Bethanie disappears with Cole, Chanti has only one chance to find her—even as her investigation puts her love life, and everything else, at risk….
Hello & Happy Wednesday!
On the whole, they were people who ( with rare exception) don’t like their job.
Apparently her best friend who is one of the funniest people I have ever known had been emailing her my postings along with other funny bloggers. It wasn’t until two days ago when I POSTED MY PICTURE next to my blog my mother realized the author was HER DAUGHTER!!! My mother’s only request is to remove my picture from this blog to protect my identity. My mother is now my biggest blogging fan, and she is happy I am somewhat utilizing my worthless journalism degree.
You can even choose your own saying and custom design it as a wall cling using their awesome design tool! You choice the saying, font, color, layout, and decorative elements. Is that cool or what? If I had my way, my entire office would be blanketed with sayings. They already kind of are! My two favorites? "Be the change you wish to see in the world" and "Live-Laugh-Love".
“This sponsorship has enabled the Conservatorium to offer a unique youth orchestra program in regional Australia. It means we’ve been able to offer a team of specialist tutors to work with the students on a weekly basis, we’ve been able to offer hundreds of scholarships to assist the development of players and we’ve had countless new Australian works written for the orchestra to perform.”
April 14, 2010 5:47 p.m. EDT
I mention the billionaire because the same idea can be applied to America. A few American Billionaires could jump start the economy.
When I was a little girl, my maternal grandmother made this dish frequently. She was quite known for it. As she grew older, cooking became more difficult, and she hadn't made drunken chicken in years by the time she passed away. I was too young to ask her how she did it when she was making it, and I wasn't interested in cooking until after she was gone. Huge failure on my part. It's just one of the things I miss about her.
I love this show. I love how it’s a modern western, I love how it keeps the dialogue in the style of Elmore Leonard. I recently described it a a guilty pleasure without the guilt. There are not many episodes of this season left, only three.
Q. Best memory supporting Celtic with the CSC?
I also fell head over heels (haha) over a pair of shoes...I will be on the hunt for many things to pair them with!
a new twisty scarf (made by me, admired by others)
And… I have fun, or so I think, news. =) I’m in Minnesota writing my book, applying for jobs, and relaxing it up. It’s great. It’s awesome. I never thought I’d like this state, city, town, etc. but I do. In fact, I think I’ve just found my new writing place. This is like a getaway for me, so peaceful and withdrawn. I feel completely satiated. I almost don’t even need the aforementioned caffeine (I said almost). Not to mention the job search and applications are going so much better out here. I actually have time to look for the jobs I want to do– that said, there aren’t a lot of them =( –but oh well, at least I’m finding some.
This is just a quickie post, nothing really exciting going on here except we for our grandson's b'day party was Sat. and we all had a great time w/him. Both sides of the family were there at Gattiland~it's a big pizza buffet place and then the kids get to play all kinds of games, almost like an indoor amusement park, sort of. Ethan will turn 11 tomorrow.
PUTAR: The PPP has requested the Indian Government to support the Resolution.
How lucky are we to have a Rabbit in the family school?
8. Cover with foil, making sure there are about 3 cm between the batter and the foil. (Tip: I spray the inside of the foil with non-stick spray in case the batter rises too high. This prevents the cake from sticking to the foil)
Get it from Sound Study Records on a greenish brown vinyl playing at 33 1/3 the appropriate shoegaze rpm, you don't need those precise peaks and valleys running as quickly as possible...just master that baby striaght down the center for maximum density.
One word of advice- If you have never had a pepperoni roll before, don’t buy the ones that are sitting on a counter in a convenience store. They are ok, depending on the vendor, but your first experience should be at a table, perhaps with a beer and music in the background.
As we enter the club we see the lights dancing all around us, the sound waves hit us so hard that our whole bodies instantly start vibrating to the music rhythm.
I guess to the dwellers of the Cities on the Plain, with their neon and their sodium light pollution, a full moon is "dramatic". But out here in the sticks - even with the M1 one side and the glow of Milton Keynes off to the North-west - it's pretty obvious that the full moon is, relatively speaking and ironically, quite a dull thing.
The image above is of Spice-Poached Apricots and Creme Fraiche.
You may be wondering what kind of camp I was at, where girls can wander around shirtless and let boys in their bathrooms and learn about chocolate and get mysterious buttons. Well, and unschooler camp. True, boys are not, technically, allowed in our bathroom, but the staff didn't mind when one of the boys came in and sat on the counter and talked with us. As for the shirtless thing, as long as the bra stays on, it's fine. After all, bras cover more skin than some bathing suits. Talk to me about hug buttons, or the intention circle, or Bean's chocolate workshop, or feeding about sixty-five people cornbread and chili in under an hour, or about the totally awesome costumes Bitty and Arne wore to prom. Ask about my recent promotion, or Advisee groups and what the hell was up with the Nathen pose, or why Madelyn and I are planning to build a Tupperware castle next year. Ask about the mosh pit at seven in the morning that woke me up, or Grace belly-dancing in one of the Talent Shows. Ask about Dave Thomas's sandwich song, or why he's called the Dish Queen, or the time he called himself Bitty and got thrown in the creek as a sacrifice.
Friday: James had no school, and I was planning an evening 10 miler, but then my friends' emergency preempted everything. I managed the logistical nightmare of getting all 7 kids to my home after school, we ate hotdogs, played outside, and had a giant sleepover. It ended up really fun, despite the circumstances surrounding it. No running for me.
Well now, here's an illustration of the contingency of reading.
unjustifiably
Sorry we haven't really been keeping everyone in the loop. We've been totally without techie tools the past few days. No fancy phones or cameras or laptops until super recently. I don't think we totally totally thought thru the fact that we wouldn't be home for quite awhile. So thank you dad for letting us steal your laptop :)
Just cross your fingers that next year Dawn gets your name.
Under the ripe red raspberry rows
Teacher: Rylie will be fine. She is extremely bright and assertive. She always tells us when we are doing something wrong. She will be just fine.
Best of all, every recipe I've read so far is easy to make. I can't wait for the weekend. This is going to be great!
81. Spend an afternoon watching old movies
One cape down and two to go!
Anyway, those are my thoughts! Few books have captured my imagination lately the way that Hunger Games did, so I am really looking forward to being captivated all over again by the movie. What about you? Do you agree or disagree with anything I’ve said here? Did I miss anything? Don’t forget to leave your comment for a chance to win a copy of The Official Illustrated Movie Companion! Cheers!
Linda we do not misunderstand you.
Thorne fisted his hand then glanced at a slim woman walking us. Her initial interest was probably due to my partner’s blond hair and svelte physique. But the bared teeth made him look a teeny bit postal. She frowned then quickened her steps past the bench where we stood by the hamburger joint. I leveled a stare at Thorne. He shrugged and muttered, “Ratbag piece of…”
Hah. That’s the big question, isn’t it? Our world is more fragile, and ours is the one that was made separate, so it wouldn’t survive the collision. And the Veil is what keeps our world in existence, so if it ever vanished, so would our world. We wouldn’t; we’d just be stuck with living in yours. Without the Veil’s protection, I might add, because it also acts as a filter, a kind of distorter of your perceptions. It’s why we’re not so noticeable in your world. The witch-queen has a beef with that, because she wants power in your world, and she can’t have it with the Veil there. So she’s got this mad idea of destroying it. Not that she has to, because it’s thinning anyway, and one day it’ll die of its own accord.
variable light into input
Garnish
Afterall, any sucessful negotiation only helps the democrats fulfill their agenda to do all this stuff to us, rather it be in little chunks or big chunks.
I am running my first marathon this Sunday! I am very stressed out about this. I would like this to count as 5 facts, which works out to 1 fact every 5.24 miles.
Hindi ko po alam kung bakit. Pasensya na.
Also I just wanted to let everyone know, Butterfly Crafts will be taking a break for Feb to find our next DT and give the blog a little re-vamp. So please join us back here on March 1st for our next challenge.......
Getting engaged in the neighborhood park
without
It is the high vibrations of love, or light, that started stirring individuals’ conscious awareness over seven decades ago, when far distant powerful civilizations beamed that lifesaving energy to your homeland planet. It was the ever-increasing light intensity on Earth that raised the collective consciousness of her residents and brought her and you to this point on the ascension pathway.
More than one disk or pattern may be entered at the prompt. Here are
Last month our family watched "Exit Through the Gift Shop." We loved it. In fact Gracie was bound and determined to become a street artist when she grew up. I tried to explain that while the art was fun and the story was great, vandalism isn't a good thing. But she was smitten. Her obsession with Banksy finally wavered a bit after she saw his recent Charlie Brown street art. Oh, ho, ho -- you mess with Gracie's beloved Charlie Brown, and you've crossed the line buddy.
today is almost over, but i didn't want to miss a day writing to you
You live your dream
6. Dinah-Moe Humm
Conversations of the sleep deprived:
2 level tbsp. shortening
And accepted and valued too.
That is, Love.
We have been in the process of adoption for several years, much longer than most people but we have had moves and other various things get in our way. We have been blessed with the most loving and supportive family and friends that have helped us navigate through emotions and logistics.
My grandmother and I left the mall and I fought the rising nausea in my stomach as I forced myself to respond to her small talk and chirped enthusiastically at the idea of stopping at Subway for a sandwich. I ordered a twelve-inch chicken and bacon ranch sub, wondering as I gave my request to the sandwich maker if he could see the despair through my face.
“Can we get two?” I asked my father.
I figured why not spread the joy, so the challenge has been extended until the end of the year! Which is good for me too, since because of other commitments (*cough* Cybils *cough*) I didn’t meet my goal yet, but am on track to finish by the end of the year. The challenge will now finish on December 31, 2011.
Mustard seeds - 3/4th tsp
In the early teens she started introducing songs to the vaudeville audience that would become classics, including “Some of These Days” her theme song, written by Shelton Brooks, who also wrote “Darktown Strutters Ball”, another hit for her (that’s the song that starts “Come and meet me at the station in a taxi, honey”). She even had a couple of novelty numbers about Rip Van Winkle: “Who Paid the Rent for Mrs. Rip Van Winkle?”and “Where Was Rip Van Winkle When His Wife Went Away?”
JAMIE: It was truly amazing growing up with so many loving, warm-hearted people around me. I can honestly say that the nine of us love each other to pieces and get along great. As a child, I was never lonely that’s for sure! Being the youngest was a challenge though because I wanted to do things that the older kids were doing but couldn’t just yet. So I learned to keep myself busy until they came home. When I was a child, I did puzzles for about 8 hours a day while the older kids were at school or elsewhere. Then, as I became older, I started to read books and I’d read book after book. I never watched much TV and I still don’t, which is ironic because I’m an actress.
Now for a run down of events happening in our lives from now back to April (my last post was March).
1789 The crew of the Bounty, led by Fletcher Christian, mutinied against the harsh life at sea under Captain Bligh. They were on the return journey from Tahiti where they had spent six months gathering breadfruit trees. Bligh and 17 others were cast adrift in a small boat without a chart. While the mutineers eventually colonized Pitcairn Island, Bligh managed to sail the small craft 3,618 miles to Timor, near Java, arriving there on 14th June.
“Hear what:”
Wood County will participate in this statewide test by doing our Weather alert to all Departments and running a full 3 minute test of the weather sirens. Important information about Wood County Outdoor Warning Sirens can be found at https://local.nixle.com/alert/4801966
Unfortunately, such discernment is no easy task, mostly because the deception itself is so encompassing and multi-layered that we can dig from one lie to the next without ever reaching the underlying truth, if it ever existed in the first place. With so few hard facts to work with, we apply intuition, pattern recognition, educated guesses and healthy skepticism, which is good enough to detect most fake narratives, but not to detect the genuine ones. Being apparently unfake is not direct proof of authenticity.
He did. He stopped crying instantly. SERIOUSLY? I was tempted to make him put it back on, but instead I gave him the long sleeved backup to wear. The hiccoughed sigh of contentment clearly told me that I'd not get that acid green thing back on him without the biggest struggle in the history of dressing unwilling toddlers. After consulting the other kids in the van, we all came to the same conclusion. It was better to call it a day and go home than drive the extra 20 minutes to the soccer field only to fight a battle to get him dressed, and have him stand on the field doing absolutely nothing in protest. Or worse; sitting on the sidelines in a sulky, 80-pound, unmovable lump.
The mage tower is your standard magic damage tower that attacks both land and air.
Okay, so I just had to do it. Start another blog... right like I needed another one. This will be all about my explorations into the world of art and creativity.
I know, typically there isn't much to cheer about on a Monday morning but hey, I've really come to look forward to Mondays now that all you wonderful crafters are sharing your beautiful creations here on Make It Monday.
Check blog comments. (none.)
Panini America, the world’s largest sports and entertainment collectibles company, and the 2011 NBA Champion Dallas Mavericks announced today that they have signed a multi-year marketing and game-worn memorabilia agreement.
You have given him dominion over the works of your hands;
Grave men, near death, who see with blinding sight
Next Kilkenny:
Feedback on your writing
Jamie Bennet falls in love with Aurelia, his Portuguese house keeper. So he had to learn Portuguese in order to go to propose to her on Christmas’ eve. In her town he had to pop the question in front of the whole town in a very poor attempt to speak the language just found out she had learn English just in case.
Reveilhac added that both APC and IP-Converge offer help to Cebu businesses to achieve goals either through building ‘smarter’ in-house data centers for them or providing ‘smarter’ data center services.
She wondered how other people did it—how they became successful. It was too easy to pin it down to luck, but even hard work was no guarantee. In her case, life just happened to her. That’s why she was so happy to have Jack. So many people in the world pined for someone. And she had Jack. On that score, she felt very lucky. But as far as other things in her life, it seemed like the Big Unknown. Jack was the only thing she was certain of.
1/2 cup (1/4lb.) butter or margarine
Hello Everyone!! Today as Splitcoast, the Free 4 All challenge is Winter Flowers! Not necessarily to have flowers that bloom in Winter, more a bit of colour to cheer those who live in the Northern Hemisphere where the snowy Winter has set in. Here in Australia however, we are in glorious Summer and thankfully it's not too hot and humid yet! :) I look around and see flowers galore, beautiful Frangipani, Poinciana, Agapanthus and still some Jacaranda so it wasn't hard to be inspired for this challenge! :)
A few “In the Process of”:
This was really good. I liked it a lot. Saving the extra syrup so I can make more later this week. I think that adding a little rum to this would be good too. After all in the movie those who drink butterbeer get a little tipsy! :-D
The pleasure is when your book of road maps gets dog-eared, rain splashed, tea stained.
Sara's second problem is gastrointestinal. Apparently all the Miralax we had been told to give her may have been making matters worse. We don't know what the real issue is, but the doctors think it may be neurologically related. So we will be off to see a gastro specialist in Shreveport soon. The neurosurgeon did see a spot on the CT scan that concerned him. He said it may be damage from the stroke she suffered at birth, that is now beginning to show up. This could be the cause of the gastro problems. We actually remember the neonatal pediatrician telling us that gastro problems could be neurological. That's all we know, thankfully we pray to an awesome God who already knows. We'll keep you posted so you can know how to pray.
Good morning and welcome to the 2 Sisters Challenge Blog. We would like to thank Stitchy Bear Stamps for sponsoring our SILHOUETTES challenge. This was the first time working with silhouette images for me but I must admit that I enjoyed it more than I thought I would. We would like to thank all of those who embraced this challenge your cards were amazing.
Since Meri and I were home puppy-sitting, we decided to get the word out that we had puppies for sale!! Gotta find the market for them sometime... So we printed off 20 or so little brochures to hand out curb-side at the annual parade this past Saturday.
I would like to thank all the people that have left comments, emailed me and poped by. It means alot and its nice to see what people have to say in response to my writing.
A few moments ago, I was randomly trolling pregnancy websites when I came across a forum in which the participants were raving about how incredibly easy and joyful their pregnancies had been for them so far. They talked about how wonderful they felt physically and how each little kick felt like a breath of heaven to them. One new mom even went so far to say that she missed pregnancy so much, she was considering trying for another child. Her current child is only 5 months old....
For the past month I have felt different - not really sure why but just different!
But then again, I already knew that.
As I work towards being a voice for change in my blog posts, I admire and look to the incredible voices of people like Andrew Bridge who survived the system and works today towards being a voice for the voiceless. Please help me bring voices to the voiceless in foster care by reading the literature and news that is lacking the force and energy needed to create change in this deeply flawed system.
It wasn't something that I ever dreamed of. It just never entered into my brain.
Blend it with the caster sugar in a bowl. Beat in eggs, one at a time. Fold in the ginger syrup (or your substitute syrup) and the molasses.
A mountain of Beef Carpaccio, her husband can eat.
Well gorgeous friends, that is all from me today……keeping my fingers crossed that my sewing machine turns up today :o)…….its alright borrowing someone else's machine, but I swear that sewing machine like their owners and no one else LOL…….
It’s almost as if he’s read and digested a maxim set out by the Guardian’s own Tim Radford in his Manifesto for the Simple Scribe. “If in doubt, assume the reader knows nothing,” says Radford. “However, never make the mistake of assuming that the reader is stupid. The classic error in journalism is to overestimate what the reader knows and underestimate the reader’s intelligence.”
I want them if they want me
I’m middle-aged, pudgy and eminently unnoticeable to the point of invisibility in most public settings. And yet I suspect they’re profiling me from the moment I walk in the door. No doubt looks are quietly exchanged and wait staff swiftly informed, “He’s one of them.” Could be I’m even directed to a special table or section where I can be watched just a little more closely.
‘Okay then.’
I wandered in to the century old building, found my way to the check-in table and signed in. I sat there nervously, waiting. I saw the other kids around me, and wondered at how poised they seemed. We did various acting exercises and interactive games, and I marveled at how clever they all were. I was doing my best to appear confident and to fit in. But really, I had no idea what I was doing.
A little later, inside the venue:
So, here's what I've received recently:
This weekend was very busy with building our new firepit! I wasn't a ton of help because I can't really do much in the way of lifting heavy stone but I served as foreman and did some work on the gravel. We got most of the stone from Ryan's uncle who wasn't using it so this project actually cost us very little out of pocket.
(yes.. I know it's a crappy cellphone photo!)
I received an email this week from a lovely reader Rebecca asking me to share our nightly routine. And in a word I'll say - early. We do everything early here. As soon as we are home from school the kids are outside riding their bikes and playing. I start dinner around 4 and we always sit down to eat before 5. It's just me and the kids and everyone is always hungry so it works for us. Plus by the time we eat dinner and some dessert and I tidy up it seems like we've been sitting forever. If we have an activity on then we eat a bit later and tend to have leftovers or something super easy.
* Make sure you are really ready for an agent. It takes time to hone this craft and it may take more than one appealing manuscript to attract an agent. Established agents represent career writers who have prolific potential.
Have you guys seen the trailer for SCORCH? It's short but really cool. I'll paste it at the bottom of this post.
The specific complaint relates to:
Probably my most common emotion is frustration. I am an incredibly ambitious person. Which is why I have a hard time functioning every day. When I know I carry a message that is true — not just scientifically supported or emotionally charged, but really true — I’ll run the teeth off the gears in my head trying to think up how to make my voice loud enough to make the problems go away. Could I ever give enough time or money or effort to make the problem go away? Could I ever convince enough people to give up enough of their time or money or effort to do the same?
I didn’t realize that the contest runs until May 10, so, despite the huge lead, we mustn’t be complacent. Vote for the cats.
I thought it would fun for you guys to see where I am when I'm not here in blog land. I work for The Mirazon Group, LLC based in Louisville, KY. It is an independent IT consulting firm that specializes in Virtualization and SAN sales and support.
Source : complied from various reports sources
shadow lingers. beyond the light
I would come to know him of course.........
Today, I got a few things at Walgreens, didn’t do as good as I wanted to, but I guess I will live. I spent to much cash, but I still have some Walgreens RRs. I have a request to put up pics of my stock pile. So I’m going to put them up Sunday morning, when I have it all cleaned and stocked up. I’m going to put up the pics from when I first started as well.
As would you, should strangers people came into your shower and started taking pictures of you soaping up your nethers. Even friends!
Mostly, the regular pink cabs would charge around 2000 baht, but we felt it more important to prioritize our safety especially that we our just starting our journey in Thailand and Cambodia. But don’t worry, I’ve had many friends who have tried the regular pink cabs, they arrived to Cambodia unscathed. So you could choose between the two options, but the Toyota Camry was already a good choice even if it was more expensive because the driver was being closely monitored by the company and there is a lady butler accompanying the driver while the guests are being taken to the destination. But if you would not like to take the Camry and just opt for the regular pink cabs, you might as well motion towards the exit upon arrival right away and just ignore the taxi agents approaching you. I tell you, they can really get persuasive– but you’re assured you’ll get to your destination safe and sound.
living in a fancy hotel
At the earlier news conference, Guerriero declined to name the children.
In ten years, the ICC has managed to prosecute one man; and a man from Africa at that. What of the most dangerous War Criminals in the world? What of the murderers of ordinary people in Serbia (in the Albanina-occupied province of Kosovo-Metohija)? What of the butchers of Iraq, Afghanistan, Somalia, Libya? What of those who have ordered the drone attacks over Pakistan? What of the murderers of Palestinians in their own lands? What of the real architects of 9/11, 7/7, Bali, Madrid? What of the software engineers who created the Stuxnet virus which has caused deaths in Fukushima, Japan, which will only become known in years to come?
Two years ago, at the beginning of this economic downturn, I had an extended conversation with a wealthy businessman about the financial prospects for our work with street kids. He warned me: “When money gets tight, people will stop giving. They will not change their lifestyles, or even give up the extras. They will quit giving.” He was right.
Me: "That could totally work."
2 bananas cut up
On Behalf of all ofthe ABC Christmas Teamies, please join us in wishing her all the best and
To be honest, the funniest part of the evening is at the end, in the ladies’ toilet; while in my cubicle, I hear the lady in the next stall fart. It’s not a ladylike fart. It is impressively musical though, like an opera singer going through her warming-up exercises. It starts as a contralto, moves up to alto, warbles through a few soprano notes, before dipping down to a final burst at contralto level again. I laugh out loud. I come out of my cubicle still laughing, assuming that the waiting queue will be laughing along with me.
One, is a woman and she is still alive
10/28 - Norfolk, VA - Norva
Congratulations Debby. We appreciate your participation in this week’s challenge. Please e-mail Claire at Claire.brennan1@ntlworld.com. Provide her with your contact information and set choice, and she will get your selected set on its way to you when shipping resumes on August 20th.
7. Zion Higher
HAAAA! I have many more of her that look like this...
Jerome K. Jerome – Christmas Eve in the Blue Chamber
UK Alcohol Health Alliance and the European Alcohol and Health Forum Science Group recently announced that Ireland and Britain are top of the European binge drinking list. Chairman of the group Professor Ian Gilmore, said the British and Irish are “Drinking to get drunk” in contrast to other European countries like Spain and France that drink at the dinner table most frequently. I believe this cultural differences lie in age old traditions. Take France for example, drinking usually starts at a younger age than In the UK and Ireland, youth are encouraged to sample and enjoy wine at meal times and therefore learn to enjoy and respect drink rather than abuse it. Ireland on the other hand teaches different values, drinking is frowned upon by a huge proportion of our society until the age of 18, therefore young teenagers more often start binge drinking in secret and thus a cycle of abuse and recklessness begins.
- Terminators and a Dreadnought. These are the unpainted troops that will battle on Sunday. If I have fun with them I should really put some paint on them.
The other dangerous delusion from which those who are wilfully or otherwise blind to realities suffer, is summed up in the word "integration." To be integrated into a population means to become for all practical purposes indistinguishable from its other members.
It is best to plan for visiting this national park in between the months from November to April. The best way to explore the park is by Jeep or by Car or by an Elephant. It depends on your choice and temperament. Usually adventurous people and wild life lovers go for Elephant ride in order to explore the park.
I mentioned previously that I'd been talking more openly with my Dad and that there was a distinct possibility that we may meet up soon, well, that was (is?) this weekend! Both my parents were planning on coming over and also bringing my son for a visit also! I do get to see my son regularly but he's never stayed over at my house before so this weekend was going to be important and fun for that as well!
"But a lot of it must be brought to the door of responsibility of those in power within the ANC. There's been a very rapid promotion and enrichment, quite obscenely so, of a small number of senior cadres."
tad viṣṇoḥ paramaṁ padaṁ sadā
"No, an opposition more striking than that between good and evil ..."
ribbons from stash
UPDATE: Turns out a bank party was held July 18, according to the Brooklyn Eagle's Dennis Holt. Independence old-timers went through a lot of old archives and got together with the people from the Brooklyn Historical Society to donate some priceless records, Holt says.
Christmas of course is always people under a lot of pressure- people who fight more, curse more, beat their wives and kids more, probably because they can’t afford to be generous- because they’re reminded- everywhere- of how little they actually have. And think about how much this all happens in public- in stores, on the street, on buses and trains, in person and on cell phones.
I can live with that.
Do you know the names of every individual child suffering deadly malnutrition and hunger pains?
I’ve only got a photo of one meal we had, but it was a good one! My plate was chicken breast with wild mushroom in a creme fraiche sauce with some kind of potato on the side, and Chris had half a roast chicken with some sort of sauce and a side of chips. We shared a starter of calamari and I had a creme brulee for dessert, which was twice the size I was expecting and Chris went for a chocolate mouse pot. Lovely!
Cuz the slop I’m ploppin’ in up top’s
27. Pillars of the Earth - Ken Follett
I'll let you know
So what exactly was ruled and what will be its impact on us the gamer, how did this start, who is winning?
Old friend, we both feel intensely. I have heard, listened intently. I have heard those regrets so often that I can walk into the night hiding my heartbreak, finding my way into daylight without looking at the horizon.
Before these faithful Christians perished, their record was safely hidden away. Joseph Smith obtained these ancient records in 1827, and with the gift and power of God, Joseph was able to translate the ancient writings into what we have today. The Book of Mormon, along with the Bible, testifies that Jesus Christ is our divine Redeemer and that by living according to His gospel we can find peace in this life and eternal happiness in the life to come. Go HERE to read more.
* pain in tailbone and hip area
This past two days I have run the block we live on. I have quickly come to the conclusion that all running is not created equal. I had a much harder time running around the block than I have running on the treadmill. At first I couldn’t figure out why I could only run for a minute before I was out of breath. D told me I was running to fast and it looked like I was sprinting. She was right. I didn’t have any knowledge of the pace I was going. On the treadmill I know I can run at 5 mph with no problem. I didn’t have this outside so I had to try to pace myself and control how fast I was going. Once I slowed down my pace I did much better. My treadmill also has a bounce to it and I can set how soft or hard my run is. Outside I cannot do that. There is no give to the concrete road. Then to top it all off the wind is blowing right at you and you have no control over that either. So I found myself having to use more force to not only propel my own body to move forward instead of just keeping myself in one place on the treadmill and then using more force to propel my body in that same forward motion while going head first into the wind. All running is NOT created equal! Running outside is much more challenging than running indoors on a treadmill.
In contrast, Acidic Cove Forests, found in similar coves and slopes, have more acidic soils and support a variety of heath family shrubs in the understory (Rhododendron spp., Kalmia latifolia (Mountain Laurel), for example) with a sparser array of spring wildflowers. The trail yesterday went through several typical acidic cove forest habitats (full of Rhododendron in flower) before passing through the rich cove forest areas.
* Start a journal – gratitude, your personal story, an art journal, use prompts, whatever works for you – get writing and creating
Wrong. Very wrong.
The very religious are highly motivated in their giving by social pressure. I’m kind of suspicious of studies like this. It might be true as big pictures of mass behavior goes, but there is a tremendous amount of personal differences, thus personal considerations that go into altruistic behavior.
Excuse/Reason: “I understood what to do however i could not.Inch
Update, January 9, 2011: Given that this article is receiving more attention due to the shooting of Rep. Gabrielle Gifford (among 18 other victims), I ought to throw a bone to a more current article on that subject: “Gabrielle Giffords Shooting: Don’t Blame Sarah Palin, Blame Jerod Loughner (Who If Anything Is A Leftist)”
200g good quality dark chocolate
Also check out the Warehouse for three OPI Shatter polishes for $30, two for $24 and one for $15. They have all current colours available and massive displays in store of them.
Other green stain remover products to try are:
Wait! What is that I hear? I think it's the wind whistling down Park Avenue and through the Dorchester non-existent office space.
A quick glance in each direction shows the street to be empty. These special eyes of mine see the glow of living things so I am certain that I’m alone. I steel through the shadows that cling to the areas outside of the dim street lamps. At this late hour it’s unlikely that anyone is looking out the windows of their cottages, but it never hurts to be safe. There is no threat here as we feared. We will not have to fight for the glory of Asgard tonight. The thought both comforts and disappoints me. My hand brushes the hilt of my sword in longing.
Fun borders and fabulous sentiments for friends, sisters and birthdays! I don't know about you, but I make A LOT of Birthday Cards and get excited to see new birthday things! :)
Ya see, lately my life seems to be on a standstill. A depressing one. Things is happening all right, but they're, well...boring. And until two days ago I was in the sort of condition where I literally burst into tears at the drop of a fecking hat. Before it even like, fell to the floor! (Man, you shoulda seen me reading Thirteen Reasons Why by Jay Asher. I. Was. A. Mess.)
Is every other twenty one year old man just like me?
You love to play with your toys and jumping in your jumperoo, reading books, playing outside and going for walks. But, you seem to have a bit of an obsession with the t.v. Mommy doesn't keep it on during the day, but your eyes are glued to the Baby Einstein episode that you watch every night before bed!
Somethin’ ‘bout livin’ in fear all your life makes you hard that way
Freed of all life’s follies,
$96830
I die cut the letters, adhered them with foam, and embellished each letter in the word 'crafts' using a variety of tried-and-true paper crafting techniques: twine wrapping, distressing, a button trio, a flower with rhinestone, a tag tied with jute twine, and a pearl embellished butterfly.
I had originally intended to have the top tier be about 2m, attached to an elastic casing of similar size. Obviously not going to work when I need at least one more tier in there.
21Shrines! where their vigils pale-ey'd virgins keep,
Ahh smokey, haggis and chips, straight from the fish and chip shop. A meal fit for a king. But before some of you think I'm going all Cooking Lager on your ass your wrong, Asahi Black is a beer I consider respectible. A smooth chocolaty malt driven dark lager. First discovered by myself at a Chinese restaurant (and not many have it) it's smooth...
All in all, everything was competent but nothing was great or better than I've had elsewhere nearby. I can't really figure out the intense popularity of the place. Mama's Lu fans, did I miss a great dish?
I'm still having way too much fun with Instagram, obviously.
Today, I’m going to meet my high school friends again. I am hoping I can get over my trauma once I see them and before I sleep again this night.
13- il Ragno 5.27
Anno's Medieval World by Mitsumasa Anno
You died in my hand
Choose amid 5 or 20 lives afterwards bold over 5 DK Coins
We got together about a week after we both got back to Michigan. We ended up going to his parents house for the night, to have drinks, watch movies, listen to music, and talk. It was fun. We talked about everything. I was a little nervous, a little ditzy, and drank a little too much. He did too, though, and nothing terrible happened. I did not go crazy (well, in a bad way, anyway), although I was loud. I'm always loud. I don't know how to train myself to be quiet. How is it done? His parents live down the road from my sister-in-law (that is a story for another time, I'll say), so I told him he could just drop me off there. She invited him to stay a while, and so he did. My nieces and nephew were there, and he was SO good with them. My youngest niece adored him. She usually cries around new people, especially men, being as she's only 8 months old. But she didn't cry at all. He held her and played with her and it was so endearing. I have never had the ambition to have kids someday, but it was still sweet watching him with them, and knowing he would probably be a good dad. (Isn't that one of the things a woman is supposed to look for in a man?)
4) I'd love for you to become a follower if you're not but it's not a requirement :)
I think sometimes I am so good at putting on a pretty face and acting all put-together, that some people don’t realize the extent of everything that breast cancer survivors go through. My outward scars and spoken words are only half of the story. They don’t show the emotional and private struggles that are continuously present. They don’t show the burden that my family has willingly endured. They don’t show the lifestyle changes and limitations that come with breast cancer.
Our own professor of Professional Responsibility, Alison Buchanan, will be speaking at the Knowledge Congress Legal Series: Ethics for Attorneys in a live webcast on July 5, 2012 from 12:00 PM to 2:00 PM ET.
Two weeks ago, Mr Livingstone said that if he regains the mayoralty, he will embark on a ‘round the world’ tour to drum up investment for London.
Here’s the deal. Not all mobile phones are smart phones, so the entire infographic is misleading. I’m a marketer, so I’m pretty sure this was intentional, too.
The entire new batch remains available directly from Jozik, although with runs of as few as 40 tapes, I can't imagine that situation will continue for long. Charming cloth sleeves and matching liner notes.
A couple of other reasons to think about moving include getting away from the inevitable distractions of working from home, and also to put you in a better mind set to do business. Working in an office may well get you more focussed on the task of building your business. Only you know the answer to this.
I just wish there was someone else aside from the one person (Emily) that knows what it's like. It would make me feel much less alone. When does this stop sucking so much?
It seems the cold likes me so much to caught often. This time something unbearable but still doing better with intense cough and blocked nose. Today is my parent’s 28th wedding anniversary and I dedicate this post to them and this photo was taken at Kotagiri and I went with a haiku poem on it, for a Friday flower post.
Let whatever perfectionist thought subside
From Nancy Bauer:
"My friend went across the monkey bars today!" She was smiling from ear to ear. I was a little surprised because her friend is a little shorter than her and also weighed more...so naturally, I thought it might be scary or difficult for her. So, I asked "She can go all the way across without falling?" and my little girl simply stated "She can with me holding her feet!"
All in all, we kicked ass today and they only worked us for nine hours. When they called wrap I seriously thought she said lunch even though we'd already eaten (passable meatballs on sticks(?) but I made them promise to get some hot sauce for tomorrow).
Of the various spin-off projects that had potential, SAD1 and the Subject Portals Project showed a lot of promise, and several excellent people were involved. These projects attempted to produce subject portals. There was a lot of discussion about what was, or wasn’t, or should have been, or should not have been, a subject portal.
*** DIRECTIONS TO USE THE DAY OF EVENT ***
Solution 2 - Walking * Marche à pied
One day I found myself with an absurd amount of goat cheese in my fridge. All of a sudden I had about 5 different types of goat cheese! Though I loooooove me some goat cheese I kinda had the feeling that I should not attempt to eat all this cheesy goodness alone. Welcome the goat cheese dinner party! I invited two of my friends over and we had three courses all with goat cheese as an ingredient.
Reading, scrapbooking, crafting, politics, cooking and baking...the list goes on.
You needn't be a fan of "Alice in Wonderland" to enjoy "Alice I Have Been" but I daresay if you read the novel, you will be curious to re-read "Alice in Wonderland" and will look at it in a new light.
While I love having the Rawland around to photograph, unfortunately I cannot review it - it is just too large for me. The frame measures 53cm x 57cm with a sloping top tube. Not only is the reach quite long, but even if we were to flip the stem and move the spacers, the handlebars would still be several inches higher than what's on my other bikes right now. Additionally, I am not comfortable using downtube shifters on serious rides, and there is no easy way to change this aspect of the build. All in all it just wouldn't be fair to attempt a review out of this. But what I can do is provide some feedback that is not test-ride-dependent.
Next week: Writing by numbers – does it work?
Celebrities derive their fame, money, and power from the people who watch and pay them. We must hold them accountable when they abuse that power to oppress anyone.
International Arms Race will be available in June on draft and in 12 oz. bottles (6-packs for Flying Dog, loose case singles for BrewDog) in the Mid-Atlantic U.S. and in the U.K.
Size: 78 Mb
The claims against MTN also include aiding and abetting violation of U.S. treaties, tortuous interference with a contract, defamation and breach of contract related to a confidentiality agreement that Turkcell says MTN violated.
“You got pooh on me!”
They separate, and Bobby lands some more leg kick. High kick from Griffin, but it misses and he slips. Bobby jumps on top and is dropping down some strikes. He’s maintaining a dominate position and throwing punishing shots from the top as the round ends.
I can take or leave people. Some people. Some people can take or leave me. I have high standards for friendship and most folks - I'm afraid - don't qualify.
Most of these mid-majors have been competitive over a period of time, if not quite dominant. All three mid-major participants in the BCS have been included. The biggest stretch on the list by far is SMU, which, quite frankly, has sucked for a while. I admit to betting on the come with regard to the Mustangs, but the money the school raised for the Jones hiring was impressive and indicates to me that SMU is ready to provide the resources to step up and play with the big boys. If you disagree, pull them out and substitute another program – perhaps Houston or Air Force.
I could see the finish, but I hadn’t passed the 29K mark yet, so I knew I had a little over a kilometer. The path took us back into the city streets, where people were lined, cheering. Some were early finishers. Everyone was so supportive, letting you know you didn’t have too much longer to go, that we were almost there. I almost gave up a couple of times, my legs felt like they were going to collapse. But I kept going. I passed the 29K mark and I thought that if I stopped now, that would be so stupid. I would be so mad at myself with under a kilometer to go.
"But we would do well to remember that this is not an issue for the
For anyone that hasn’t seen it, Tupac performed at Coachella, a music and arts festival that was held last weekend.
Improved Digestion
The concept of small, lightweight "assault" packs, in the form of one-day or three-day packs, are not new to light-infantry forces. From the haversacks of pre-industrial armies that lived largely off of pack trains, to the ALICE LCE buttpack (as previously mentioned, as dismal failure of a concept, if you ever have to hump a real ruck as well), the concept has a great deal of historical precedent. Unfortunately, for the future resistance guerrilla light-infantryman, outside of urban enclave-based elements, it's a largely over-rated concept for carriage of the sustainment load.
07 As Heaven Is Forever 04:47
According to Mr. Johnson, "There haven't been any major changes in the Princess Theater itself; the changes have been in the movies made and in the number of movie theaters in Roane County. The Princess is the only one left, and even though it's the only movie theater
Question for that Indian Ed: How Will The Current Student Loan Debate in U.S. Congress Affect Indian Country?
- 2 cups of chicken stock
1-11 Glass Structure 3:55
Ooh, hard to pick, I have so many. They're usually really violent, though: murders and gore and such.
Those 545 human beings spend much of their energy convincing you that what they did is not their fault. They cooperate in this common con regardless of party.
“Why not hire a band of hobbits with blow guns to shoot the bandits when you surprise them with all the fake corpses that suddenly spring to life?” asked Lanna. Hermel stared at her, trying to figure out if she was offering a serious suggestion, or making light of his planning skills. He couldn’t decide, so he thought that idea over.
Is this what we are supposed to teach our children? Just say sorry and all will be forgiven. There is no need to show remorse, make restitution or pay a price for breaking the law.
Thanks for taking a peek - off to post my card and then on to enjoying a beautiful Sunday! Have a great week - Cathy xx :)
It’s a tough one. How would you deal with an ineffective Manager?
Caleb was cool about it. He was the one who went to state. He didn't like the awards ceremonies either. I think he uses his trophies as hammers and battle axes on his brothers.
to become again
7 p.m. So hungry. Eat puppy chow.
Q: So if that movie were to be filmed again, would you film it?
It was a very special day for me and nine others. That was the much talked about, speculated and awaited – the day of the Bebas. The AADK wasn’t going to just give us our watikah and let us loose, no – they insisted on holding a ceremony… We, the group of selected inmates from the centres in Pahang, who had spent our last three months undergoing a special programme. And Rahim; he was a Pembimbing Rakan Sebaya (PRS – Peer Group Guide) – an elite group of people with a very crucial role in drug rehabilitation.
The Secret Service #1
You’d think, if public policy actually worked in the rational, quasi-scientific way that some progressives wish it did, education “reformers” would be completely discredited both on empirical and credibility grounds. The fact that they aren’t, that the “reform” agenda of high-stakes standardized testing, “accountability”, school choice, charter schools/deregulation, and mayoral control still drive national, state, and local policy, should suggest an alternative: education “reformers” are a special interest, who’ve mounted a successful capture of education policy.
"She said the menu was excellent and she enjoyed lunch," Thomas said of Mrs. Obama. "She commented that the menu was very healthy."
10. Hate On Me
I made this little thank you note using some new Jillibean Soup paper I got at CHA (Thanks Kimber!) and a stamp by Hero Arts (Thank you Messages):
This post is going to be split into three different topics. Before reviewing and previewing the current on-court antics, I wanted to focus on a couple of recent articles in The Post and Courier. They touch on subjects that impact The Citadel’s department of athletics in general and its basketball program in particular.
Ted glares. “So will anyone do so far?”
1 similarities
Dharamsala: Former US speaker Nancy Pelosi has said there is a need for the Chinese government to change its repressive policies regarding Tibet, a statement said on Thursday. “In recent weeks, the Chinese government has intensified its crackdown; …
The coming week is now porn week. Personally I like porn. Maybe too much. I have a theory about my internet and why it's so slow. I think my ISP just likes to kill my bandwidth at the middle of the night to discourage me from looking at it. But that just means I have to wait a little bit longer. It's just like the old days when I was on my parent's computer with dial-up.
Mountain Sun Pub & Brewery Illusion Dweller IPA
Poolesville 11, Bethesda-Chevy Chase 1
Why is it important to make such fine distinctions about modes of combative/subcombative narrative, or about levels of violence in those narratives. The answer for me is contained in the Northrop Frye quote in the first part of FX:
The perfect occasion arose for me to share what's in my makeup travel bag. We are on our way to South Carolina as this is posted. In fact, I am typing this from our hotel room in Orlando. We are going to be there for 5 days, so naturally I packed enough makeup for a month.
I've written a lot about sewing machines, both here and in Vogue Patterns, and what I write is based on my own experience. No matter how many machines I've sewn with, there will always be many, many others I'm not familiar with. I love reading other people's sewing machine reviews on sites like Pattern Review, but I always take them with a grain of salt. Again, it's subjective.
It is a known fact that children are more inclined to pay attention to colorful visual aids and catchy tunes compared to reading a text book during study time. Fortunately, developers of apps children such as ThinkCube have created a more enjoyable learning environment by introducing fun kids apps like CookieCoo Dancing Star to the market. This particular iPad apps for children by ThinkCube is geared to teaching children new concepts such as rhythm, coordination, and vocabulary in a game setting. This way, the attention of young children won't stray away from the learning session because it is set in a more enjoyable manner.
Recognizing others positive traits allows us to see our own good qualities as well. Along with these good traits, we each have areas of weakness, such as talking out of our anger or being caught in our misperceptions.
today i've decided that since its alittle well.. brisk out side today that i'd add some Rainbows to my day. Rainbow Splendour that is..LOL... so i'm sharing a layout that i created a while back at Gilly's ..inspiration by the most amazing Renee Iveson..she'd done this page using yellow background with the swipes of blue..so i cheated and copied that idea..and then went from there..and this is what happened....
Or Tom Tom ‘Go’ with Lane Assist
Boykin 2 tackles, INT return (75 yards)
Isn't the blouse pretty? I love the deep U neckline and the sweet little puffy sleeves. It's actually quite long - hip-length - and I'm looking forward to wearing it untucked at least once this month.
Determined to stop her wayward brother from squandering their dwindling fortune, Lady Eliza Brentford decides to follow him to his favorite den of depravity. There, among the candlelight and raucous revelry, she encounters her brother’s role model in debauchery, the notorious Marquess of Haddan, Gryffin Dwight. Staring into his smoldering green eyes, Eliza can’t help but find the rakehell nobleman seductively charming-and sinfully attractive.
Now don't forget Mad for Markers will be at Paperific on 1-3 April - with the full range of Ciao and Sketch markers as well as THE April release of The Greeting Farm stamps including the NEW Creeper kit!
How will I feel 10 yrs from now? …. I don’t want to be ghost then reappear in her life at 15.
I failed JLPT Level 1 and am still not sure how to deal with it. I can't say that I needed the certification for anything. But I wanted it, and the fact that I failed it by two lousy points is just awful. If they held these exams more often and they didn't cost so much money to take, I probably wouldn't feel as shitty about the results. But between the ever-rising yen, and the fact that I feel absolutely financially screwed for the next few years of my life, I don't know if I should even consider retaking the exam in July.
Like most we post, if you dig, search for more info.
In the end, we mess up the whole project, or give up, because of that one little hiccup. Or perhaps we have to start all over again, yet already we feel deflated. We wanted everything to be perfect and went to meticulous lengths to so ensure, and now it’s all crumbled down.
I poured five trash cans full of water out of the window during the course of the storm. Small desk sized trash cans, not the big outside ones. But, still.
The second problem is more serious and to the point of the present discussion. Psychological predicates, as I argued at length in Chapter Two, are not predicated of brains or nervous systems but of whole persons. This goes for consciousness every bit as much as it does for intentionality. Brains no more feel or sense things than they think about or imagine things. Persons think and feel. Asserting this does not exclude me from the club of materialists in any way.
in the
It also became obvious why we get multiple POVs in this book which I think was done to better effect when it was just Claire and Shane in Bite Club. Here it added little in terms of character development but is required in order to get every side of the story.
The cartoonist, Mahmoud Shokraye, depicted Ashtiani in a football stadium, dressed as a footballer, with a congratulatory letter in one hand and his foot resting on the ball.
Kim from WW sent me a list of things to do to combat boredom and I am going to share them with you. I will also add my own commentary to the mix.
"We are supportive of students right to have religious beliefs in school," board superintendent Nancy Pynch-Worthylake said in an earlier interview.
Thank you for being my inspiration and friend
Jane continues:
I would say the aim is to chill, but in fact the aim is to get away from the chill (in London) and hopefully find some sunshine (in Florida).
so I can go help!
Just think about it!
Praise for the sweetness of the wet garden,
co-workers let me use hers before school started, and I was hooked.
4. This was the song the boys kept singing in "Stand By Me."
We are far past sending out talking points. Do not attempt to dumb it down. We cannot stand any more explanations. Have you talked to any Democratic senators lately? I have. It's pretty damn clear they are not happy campers.
Mark said that it was all well and good to complain about the state of the world but the book doesn't provide any answer (not that he'd read it), and then we had a skirmish about whether or not novels need to provide answers, which Mark insisted they do. Some people referred to fact that the trio finally go off to Mexico with the notion of starting a hotel, and Mark's derision quadrupled: another kind of running away!! And in order to run a hotel, he objected, wouldn't they end up needing the very structures (accountants etc) they were supposed to despise?! People told him, no it's not that kind of hotel, the characters say they wouldn't charge for rooms: it's just a kind of idealistic dream really; and Mark's derision went through the roof. Backed by John, I said, yes, it's flakey, but that's the point: the book is about the fact that if you can't face the structures society endorses - you're unsuited to them or you disapprove of them - then there aren't really any other very viable options. John brought in the question of the situation for artists, which I thought confused the issue, but Jo, who up to this point had been a detractor, took up his point and agreed that there are certain jobs in our society that are rewarded and others, including artistic endeavour, that tend not to be. To some extent this did back up my point, but, I said, the characters here are not artists, and so don't even have the compensation of artistic fulfilment. Having rejected the endorsed structures they have nothing (just that 'silence'). I said, surely that's a legitimate subject for a novel - ie the fact that there aren't any answers - and several people agreed. Mark said, well, in any case the characters were unlikeable, and now we had that other old skirmish about whether or not you need to find characters likeable in order to like a novel, Mark insisting - I'm damn sure for the sake of argument! - that you did, until John brought in Jane Austen and Vanity Fair with their unlikeable but endlessly interesting characters. But then Clare said that she simply hadn't found these characters or their situation, or indeed the book, interesting.
This month, I've enrolled in an April Scraplift Challenge. We are in teams of four, each taking a week in turn. I'm in "Team Trouble" (no looks of surprise out there) and I'm down as week three. The two layouts preceding mine are both delightfully creative and individual. An intimidating act to follow!!!
Five years after a peace accord marked the end of a decade long civil war, Nepal’s political transformation has entered its final phase.
I’m currently dreaming of a dining room makeover and saving up to buy flooring, wainscoting, paint, furniture and accessories for the room. You know, just everything. The room is sadly empty right now:
You may not believe it, but I actually had fun cleaning old sippy cups that were destine for the trash and making them like new again. Here are some pictures of my "Sippy Revitalization" in progress. You can see all the little nooks & crannies that I am able to finally clean!
Only time will tell.
Our system is flawed, like all systems and people. That doesn’t mean it’s the wrong system nor that the world is coming to an end. However, blind following of ideologies is cute but childish. No ideology covers every contingency, and sometimes you have to take drastic measures to re-right the train. We all agree that murder is wrong, but we can all come up with a scenario that justifies killing someone. So why can’t we do the same with our governmental system? Why can neither side see that there really are evil people in the world across the spectrum? To the left I say: that person might not be a misunderstood pauper, they might just be a terrorist. To the right I say: that investment banker was actually exploiting and circumventing the system with no regard for anyone else and that makes him a criminal. It’s all the same in that they’re still evil. Neither Ayn Rand nor Ghandi have THE answer. Nor does anyone else. Ideology as a guide with a strong dose of pragmatism as a rudder is a much more effective way to enter into any situation.
Johnny Ace in the back with Eve when she has Teddy come in. He serves champagne. HHH calls Johnny.
Artwork, digital booklet, extras. Buying our album on our Bandcamp page also allows us to give away photos, album artwork, liner notes, and lyrics. We also are able to sell physical copies of our album. Everybody likes having more stuff (especially for less). This brings me to our next point:
Was it planned this way? No. It was just a wacky- and cheap- bid for attention from a small company with a small marketing budget. It went viral because . . . well, just because it was bizarre, over the top, and cool, we guess. For almost no money, Blendtec has reaped more than 161 million YouTube views, 380,000 subscribers (making it #40 on YouTube’s all-time list), and a 7X increase in sales.
RIM is keeping the PlayBook party going. While speaking at a BlackBerry World breakfast with RIM CEO Thorsten Heins stated the company plans to launch an LTE-enabled PlayBook by the end of the year. However, the CEO didn’t detail the projected release date, price or available wireless carrier.
Before we get to the cards, sadly we have to say goodbye to our lovely GDT girlies Marika and Louise who have been with us for the last 4 weeks. Thank you so much for being part of our team and for sharing your beautiful work with us xxx
The grub contains the beauty of its future
Publisher: Moody Publishers
Friday, I dragged myself out of bed bright and early to catch the train (or I should say trains) to Chauny. Once there, I booked it up to the lycee, because I wanted to see my favorite class, the TGM, which had already started. They were beyond thrilled. I got such a warm welcome. And Claude, being Claude, was like "Did I know you were coming back?" Uhh, yeah, I told you Tuesday. And then he went on to say that the students all said I was coming, but he didn't understand how they could possibly know that. They were all like "It's called the internet! And Facebook!" LOL. They enjoyed my Rice Krispies Treats and and Reese's. Though one kid, bless him, was like "Mais y a pas de cookies?!" (But there are no cookies?!). It's so like him. Walking out, I saw Francois (he was replace A. who was sick. Sad)! I hadn't seen him since I left! Such a pleasant surprise!
For Obama, Bill Clinton is a fundraising juggernaut, a powerful reminder to voters that a Democrat ran the White House the last time the economy was thriving. For the spotlight-loving former president, stronger ties with the White House and campaign headquarters mean he gets a hand in shaping the future of the party he led for nearly a decade.
The walk back up to the bus stop was grueling. As I tried to catch my breath during the ride, I took a closer look at the map and saw that there was a better route that went right to the Exploratorium…I had been so impressed with how the doorman at the hotel knew all the routes by heart that I hadn’t thought to double-check his recommendation.
If your kids love science, or if you need to find a way to encourage them to love science, you will love this DVD. It's great fun for any level of student; the more advanced the student is, the more he or she will learn from these projects, while the younger students will just have fun and fan the flame of their interest in science.
In April, the commission decided not to establish a separate universal service fund for “insular areas.” (Puerto Rico is defined as a non-rural insular area). The FCC concluded that current high-cost fund support for Puerto Rico had been sufficiently increased–by 54% between 1998 and 2008–that it was not necessary to create a new fund.
Moses Stone, Stronger – That same TVLine article I mentioned before said that Moses was the weakest performer on Christina’s team. I don’t think I agree with that. Sure, he didn’t sing, per se, but he was definitely entertaining. Adam told him he has more potential as a singer than a rapper, and Blake made some comment about the show being called The Voice and that he wants to hear people sing. But I agreed with Christina, for once – I think Moses is a good performer overall. I hope he sticks around awhile longer.
Their necks tilted back as it approached. It towered at least fifteen feet high.
I got radio silence on that last post, except for three of my most loyal commenters, Duchesse, Debbie, and Bec, who are quickly turning the comments section into social hour. Ladies, comments sections are not for fun-having, gossiping, or bonding. They're for MJ idolatry, of which there wasn't much last time, so... carry on with whatever you three are doing in there, I guess.
Yeah, A few things were used, but I'm not above that (namely the jsk and cutsew). So long as I like it and it's not damaged or have giant sweat stains or something, I'll probably buy it. Overall not a bad haul for $300. I think it went slightly over budget (I blame shipping), and the grand total was like $308. I needed some accessories, so I bought a lot of those. Pics, but none of the petticoat, too poofy to contain...
Mention needs to be made of two huge talents, apart from the raggedly glorious Mr Joe Camilleri, that contribute indelibly to the album: that of vocalist Atlanta Coogan and artist Victor Rubin. Atlanta May Coogan (her name could come from a Camilleri tune!) is a great voice; her stamp is all over the music here, whether sharing lead vocal with Joe (‘Its Only Xmas’ is standout), or taking the lead on her own on the torchy blues ‘Lovin You’, one can hear why she made Mr Camilleri’s ears prick up when he first heard her on the Fogg album he produced in 2003.
An Analysis of ASEE-ELD Conference Proceedings: 2000-2009 - David Hubbard
Intimation to NAB
Today and everyday I cling to Jeremiah 29:11: For I know the plans I have for you, plans to prosper you and not to harm you.
EDIT: I did an other vase with a bigger opening (Pink Valentine's Vase), and it dry perfectly. Some people were curious if it would hold up to water, so I put a bit of water in it overnight. It's bubbling the paint and lifting so do not put water in it!!!! Maybe if it were sprayed with a sealer after it could hold up to water though, just a thought.
(Not what you thought, was it!)
bottom.
(f) often has difficulty organizing tasks and activities (e.g., "Honey, we can heavy pet right after I finish this entry," and/or "The twins know how to use the deep fryer just fine on their own. Just one more minute!")
I have no regrets at anytime that I make the decision to give birth to this little Princess of mine. Never a single seconds that I lash out that I am regret (no matter how hard or how bad her tantrums be)
Afghanistan, whose new military is being developed for interoperability with those of the major Western powers through the NATO Training Mission – Afghanistan, is another candidate.
1. Jen Lee (R) 44; 2. Alexis Hios (R) 46; 3. Cristiana Villani (R) 50; 4. Frida Henningsonn (R) 52; 5. Alex Ostan (R) 59; 6. Cara Kingsley (R) 66; 7. Cori Pitiger (H) 71; 8. Blair Finkel (H) 76; 9. Federica Balboni (H) 78; 10. Samantha Stein (H) 86.
This could be simple faux stitching, sewing machine stitching or even hand stitching! As long as your project is stitched in some way it will be eligible for the wee prize! As ever you can enter any crafty creation not only cards!
God has seen my desire for more time at home and through an unconventional way, He has given me the desire of my heart for today. Home.
it is made that way. you can see the mold seams on it.
This LP was ostensibly made just for the students of Richfield High School and their families. I performed some fancy digital editing to "Silver Bells," which originally ended with an awkward key change.
During every meal there would be a look, a head nod, and the next thing you knew there were two empty seats and smoke wafting past the window. It often happened at check time. Many hours were spent alone together on the overhanging ocean dunes balcony inhaling toxic love. Smoking is very sensual, lighting each others cigarettes under the bright moon, over the roiling ocean, until the coughing and spitting begins.
Lets see everyone have access to their basic needs in life and feel proud we were a part of making it happen!
There were a number of inspirations for my debut novel, The Canker Death. On the factual plane, the inspiration came from the fact that an FTP server I was running on one of the old Unix systems in my basement got hacked. I have a collection of unusual computers that run esoteric operating systems. Where most people’s computer knowledge ends is where mine begins. This fact alone gave me the idea for a main character who was based quite a bit on various facets of people I know – computer geeks, that is.
Oh, and we have to finish building the site before presenting to class in two weeks. That’s fourteen days, and the clock is ticking.
1 1/4 cups unbleached all-purpose flour
SO.....what's new this week?!
Each morning, Christine wakes with no memory. From the clues she left herself, she tries to piece together her identity and sort lies from the truth. The unrelenting pace thrusts the reader into the
Acer Iconia Tab A500 For The Ultimate Gaming Experience
And if I try to put myself in someone else's shoes I actually think I can see how people might think all that.
As you know I was away last week (to Normandy, which I loved) and this coming week I will be away from home as well. To London this time with the same school as last year. Actually this is the fourth year I will be driving them to London. Which I love. I even made it into the trip's booklet, albeit with a bit of a bad photo. Although my friend Pepperfly (who is responsible for it) told me it would only be a pleasant surprise if they then saw me in real life. Hm, not convinced...
And indeed, were Sessions in the room last night at the Free Library of Philadelphia, I believe he would have had some of his lingering quibbles satiated.
· 2+ Years Flex / Action Script development Experience
“Where?” Standing was getting easier, but Rel didn’t quite dare let go of the cliff wall. He blinked water out of his eyes and tried to see past the end of the gorge. It really was getting dark quickly.
Ronald Peterson, of Elvaston Way, Tilehurst, told Reading magistrates he wanted to speak out against what he believed to be the flouting of planning regulations and public funding of the building in Oxford Road, West Reading.
The dogs quickly connected and the humans did, too.
Read The Wind Blows Free
A 750-milliliter bottle of Bacardi Superior P.R. Rum sells for $14.99 in Pennsylvania and $15.99 at Plaza Wines & Liquors in Manchester, N.J. A Yellow Tail Chardonnay is $7.99 in Pennsylvania and $8.99 at the New Jersey store.
Pulp Fiction flips race relations to challenge a dominant ideology of race that suggests the superiority of Anglo Americans and criminal tendencies of African Americans.
Ribbon is from one of my DT buddies.
I use the wings of the land-bird and use the wings of the sea-bird,
Needless to say, there was some enlightening cultural exchange going on. I’m so glad to have met them all, and I wish them nothing but happiness, health, and safety as they make their ways both in South America and in life. Somehow the idea of them achieving their travel dreams makes me really happy.
for cake
¼ cup unsweetened applesauce
My son has been sick for a VERY long time to the point where I needed to run him in to the Dr.
Hats, Mittens, Shoes and Socks
The thought has scampered across my mind several times in the past few weeks that Christian education is simply declaring the works of God. Whether math, history, science, language, art, logic, or music, these things are, in a sense, the works of God, things that God has done. For would we have language or mathematics unless the Creator had given these things to us? Could we reason from one idea to another or draw and paint unless our God was creative and had given us creativity as creatures made in his image?
Scallop Circle Punch
Love alone is not enough, boy do I love that man… I love him I do and I want my son to love him twice as much but I’m done sitting here waiting for a man who says he loves me to show me he does,
Row 6-8- sc in each
Although I am excited, I am a little uneasy. You see, my new office will be in my daughter’s old bedroom. Is there a statute of limitations on a kid’s claim to her room? She has been in her own apartment for a year and a half. But I know so many parents who have had kids bungee back into their lives when they lost a job. The minute that I repaint the bedroom and haul the mattress out, will my daughter come back like a Karmic boomerang? (Not that I would mind, really honey. This will always be your home.) And when she visits, will she feel awful having to stay in the guest room?
The second class of inventions is most controversial because of the complexity and ambiguity in defining the class. The definition reads: ‘the subject matter disclosed had, before such disclosure, been publicly disclosed by the inventor, a joint inventor or another who obtained the subject matter disclosed directly or indirectly from the inventor or a joint inventor’ (§ 102(b)(1)(b)). US lawyers and academics read the definition to remove from the state of art any disclosure of an invention after the first disclosure which falls into the first class as long as the inventor files an application within the 12-month grace period regardless of such disclosure made by another inventor who independently developed the same invention. In other words, the definition of second class should read to give priority based on the date of disclosure. This view is foreign to the first-to-file world, where a disclosure gives rise only to a patent-defeating effect. However, US lawyers who are trained in the first-to-invent world view the disclosure as evidence of invention which gives rise to priority for obtaining a patent as well as the patent-defeating effect. This interpretation is supported by some discussions in Congress where a sponsor of the AIA bill emphasized the protection of an inventor by giving the priority based on his or her disclosure (22 June 2011, H4420-4452 (here)).
potato
“Hah, because you’re wrong. I told you my player was good. Look at his point totals. Look at how well the team is doing because of him.”
163But o'er the twilight groves and dusky caves,
I have wanted to try my hands on cooking Mexican or even Tex-Mex food at home for a while now. When I finally got my acts together to do my research and found a recipe suitable for a first timer like me, the specialty shop was closed when I arrived with my list of ingredients.
07. Girl
Indeed, about the only meaningful trait Herbert displays in terms of him being HG Wells is that he’ll supposedly write several books based on these experiences. But, of course, the plots of his books don’t really resemble Timelash either. There’s a few names he might have ripped off, but this story’s suggestion that the events of Timelash secretly inspired the writing of HG Wells is... well, it’s a complete evasion of the actual history of science fiction in favor of a vague “history-ish” approach.
I've been doing a really shoddy job of posting regularly. Each check-in gets later and later. I feel like I have to force myself to post every week. I feel it's time to call it quits. There are several reasons for this:
This is a very simple one I use.
Yanjing Brewery – Co. is in talks to buy Kingway Brewery Holdings Ltd for USD 700m, according to a person familiar with the situation. (Dow Jones Newswire/Fox Business)
I'll go back to Flagstaff as soon as I can, and when I do, I hope to be able to visit Beaver Street Brewery again.
"Trio Mocoto -Trio Mocoto -1973 Brazil":
This is sort of a lazy post - I haven't posted in a while, and I'm not going to say much about this record because I agree pretty much entirely with Doug Payne's take on it. I'll just mention that I kind of like the "needless fuzz guitar", and that the Goffin/King Shirelle's hit "Will You Still Love Me Tomorrow" gets a righteous soul-jazz treatment. Also I'd like to give some applause to Billy Harper on sax, whose own Black Saint albums are essential listening.
I continued to read , it was as though I was there.
For those of you who felt that the original sign was way too bright for our brownstone neighborhood, rest assured. As reported earlier, the company agreed and took it down immediately. A temporary one has been hung, but a new, more muted sign will go up very shortly. Pictures to follow.
In Beer Girl language, it's a light beer that tastes more like a real beer. It has flavor. Some light beer drinkers will not like that about this beer. But that's why I love it.
good, but that alone isn’t enough to get you through life victoriously. The
6 study
'It was the Pope,' another replied. 'He's in direct contact with heaven and has access to all wisdom.'
"Another winter of this," the rugged hulk of a man muttered, "and I'll throw myself into that forge." He sighed heavily in a sort of barking cough. The knot in his belly failed to disappear.
"Fascism has taken up an attitude of complete opposition to the doctrines of Liberalism, both in the political field and in the field of economics".
Kansas City Related Posts: 86
A zombie-holding zone, or zomb Guam, as it’s more commonly known, is an area that’s put aside exclusively for zombies to keep them out of the way during a party or event. This practice, which is patently offensive to zombies and the women who date them, has been wholeheartedly condemned by the NAAZP. Nevertheless, many women, particularly those of the older generation, still think it’s perfectly fine to park zombies in a dark corner like they’re strollers.
We're also trying out some mashed bananas. He seems to like the taste, but who knows if he's actually swallowing any.
Michelle Jenner posed for photographs at the photo call for her new movie ‘Extraterrestre’ held at the Roxy Cinema on Tuesday (March 20) in Madrid, Spain.
My copy of the single doesn't have it's brown paper bag sleeve, but it was a lot cheaper than it would have been if it did.
Butch Walker made my #1 album of 2010, I Liked It Better When You Had No Heart, and while the follow-up didn't have the same kind of impact on me, perhaps because it wasn't the first album I heard by him, it helped cement him as one of my favorite songwriters in the world these days, while his backup band the Black Widows continue to gel into a perfect foil for him, even making contributions to the songwriting on The Spade.
The Institute possesses a complex of unique astrophysical equipment deployed in the Sayan Mountains, especially the Siberian solar radiotelescope, a large solar vacuum telescope, an incoherent scatter radar, as well as a network of astrophysical laboratories throughout the territory of Siberia.
n the present day:
And also, can I just give you a nice gentle reminder to ask if you could make sure that you link your card and not your blog when using good old Mr Linky please my lovelies. It makes life so much easier for our DT if they don’t have to go searching for your cards.
I suppose the downside is that, as it’s so easy - and free - to publish a book, many people are bypassing a good editor and publishing work that is substandard and which gives digital publishing a bad name. I’m lucky in that my e-books are published by Carina Press, the digital-first arm of Harlequin and there’s little Harlequin doesn’t know about the publishing industry. All books at Carina go through three lots of edits - developmental edits, line edits and then a final proof edit - before a marketing strategy is planned. Small e-book presses, however, are opening up with a view to earning a quick buck and putting out books that are poorly presented and need editing. That could be a problem.
5. A Change of Heart
The film cites landmarks of Mr Obama’s Presidency such as the auto industry bail-out, Osama Bin Laden’s death and the end of ‘Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell’ in the military.
I can’t really see it for sure.
CL. I don’t think I could list these –but I’m interested in listening, I’m interested in the sensuous qualities of sound – the thrill of a being immersed in small sounds in a big space kind of thing, I’m interested in what sound can tell us about people and places, I’m interested in texture, I’m interested in bass, I’m interested in language and talking……… What my official bio actually says is that my current interests include how sound relates to our environment and our collective and individual memories; composing with the spoken word; sound and gender and cross arts collaboration, but I don’t really feel this captures it. In a way you kind of get stereotyped and even trapped by how you define yourself – I would like to think that I am always about to do something completely different.
optional ingredients
When they thrust those chubby arms up in the air? I like to believe it's because a spirit is taking their hands.
Here's how I always heard the story. You go into a room with a mirror and turn all the lights off (this works well in a bathroom). You begin, in a whisper, to chant "bloody mary. bloody mary, Bloody Mary", as you continue to chant your voice should grow louder and louder into a near scream. While you are chanting you should be spinning around at a medium rate and taking a glimpse in the mirror at each pass. Near the 13th repetition of the words . . . "she" should appear and...?
Last Sunday we visited a 'doors open' weekend at a farm that specialises in all things bio, particularly small scale manufacture of 'purins' or natural brews which bring many benefits to the garden. An open door weekend is in fact something of a small fete with numerous stalls and activities taking place.
Thank you to the many people who have included me on their websites, interviews and podcasts.
And when I feel nothing because pain and hurt have smothered me like a blanket on a wild fire, you make me feel again.
The iconic 1945 photograph of a sailor locked in a passionate kiss with a nurse in New York City’s Times Square may not mean anything to the younger generation, some of who may not have seen the picture at all, until now.
I just happened to get an order in last week from Two Peas In A Bucket which had a stamp that was perfect for this color combination. We are also able to add 1 color of our choice, so can you guess what I picked? Red, of course!
Nervous, hell. I was terrified.
Understanding reality comes with age. As I got older I realized that they call it dreaming for a reason. When’s became if’s. I realized there is logic and what is expected and accepted in today’s society.
Seconds later, the baby saw light at the end of the tunnel. With the last ounce of energy, Elise released the baby completely. George was relieved and overjoyed.
The firm added a lawyer a short time ago, and yesterday, during the course of a brief conversation on our way out, she said I was scary, then said I was approaching geekdom, then said I'd gone way over the line and was definitely a geek.
Accomack County Sheriff Larry Giddens says Deputy Jason Campbell was simply caught on tape making a mistake. He tells WAVY.com the young officer wasn't responding to a call and shouldn't have been speeding. The sheriff says Campbell has been disciplined. He wouldn't tell us Deputy Campbell's punishment.
a patch of blue
so packing up my family for a week away
Rocking the fro. November, 2008. This look requires a lot of combing with a big-tooth comb. If you leave it out like this too long, it becomes knotty and the last thing a Black woman needs is knotty hair.
A thought occurred to me today while telling a story to the guys at work. I've lived but three places in my adult life. And despite the fact I consider myself an okay guy, a sociable sort of fellow who is easy to get along, in every single place I've ever lived one of my neighbors has hated me.
"Sir James, despite the studied calmness of his demeanor when with Lucy Balfour or in the presence of those he deemed his inferiors, was of a nervous temperament, at times easily influenced, again firm to the point of stubbornness, according to his mental reaction to whatever force against which he found himself in opposition."
If McGarity hasn’t sewn up Grantham’s new deal yet, I bet he wishes he had.
10And what he did to the two kings of the Amorites east of Jordan, to Sihon, king of Heshbon, and to Og, king of Bashan, at Ashtaroth.
A total of four ‘She’ fundraisers have now been performed over the last few months. We can consider them a success, and essential money has been raised towards the production of the February 2012 shows.
Today's winner is Lorena! She suggested, "I want to see you wear a vintage white sailor like shirt you have, it has a black bow. I am not sure if you can remove the bow, but if you can i would love to see you replace it with the skull scarf. This paired up with black trousers (for a change) and your tsubo yellow shoes."
and forgotten by all
I really don’t wanna talk about it much cause I’d be spoiling the entire story if I said another word!
The Lord revealed Himself to Saul as his Judge, not Saviour. This produced a great turmoil in the heart and soul of the persecutor. This turmoil was not abated for Acts 9:9 tells us that for three days he neither ate nor drank. He did nothing but pray. He was not given the remedy for his sin.
She had a sister (biological)
“Oh, Christ, it’s cheesy, Mother, cheesy!!” she said.
And this goes for our Laws! Laws must never be winked at for in time, given the LAW of eventuality we break into bedlam & chaos in various degrees. Today everyone has no respect for our own laws. LOOK at our Government. They won’t enforce our current laws and our own Whitehouse is breaking the law; breaking it even in the face of congress!! Finally, our national debt at minus 15 trillions and growing, our country will not survive by continuing to give wonderful handouts to “illegal” murders, drugies, & plain people to say the least. God help us all, NOW!!
i’ll try to get them done tonight! would you rather see the different outfits as single entries, or as one big post? what is easier for you, my darling readers to read/look at?
The picture is absolutely stuffed with symbolism! I have not attempted to pick out every symbol. In Tudor times, people could read symbols as easily as we read words, and everybody would have understood the meaning of the objects Holbein chose to place in this portrait.
2.Next day,wash the lentils well and add 4 cups of water,ginger,green chilli and pressure cook the dal till mushy.
Tash's idea :)
He had the taciturn temper of the West: concealed feelings, clenched teeth and seething smile. Leave him alone and you were fine. Enter his space and you may not leave it alive.
The world had shrunk to her immediate periphery, making her acutely aware. Mom seemed miles away and unreliable.
"Pain doesn't exist until the brain gets hold of it. And one of the things brain imaging has been very good at is taking away some of the myths and cultural biases against pain," she said at a meeting of experts in London earlier this month.
- recent interpretations tend to stress more mundane factors and motivations for the movement. The migratory habits to acquire more land, which were firmly established by trekboers throughout the 18th C, had been bottled up for 40-50 years and there were growing numbers of landless white males. In trekboer society, this was a terrible situation and fate. Their only course was to become a ‘bywoner’ to some relative or other farmer with land. As such, they would provide services (usually as an overseer) and be allowed to use some land for a few cattle or agricultural purposes. This meant that their status was only a bit better than non-white servants.
Could I feel any more like a giant turd? Simply put, this family was not, and never would be, equipped to handle this type of news. They aren't the type to understand, let alone wrap their heads around and accept, any of this. Without thinking, I had rocked their world. And I felt terrible about it. I wasn't upset with their reactions, nor the fact that I would never hear from my friend again - ever. I just felt badly that I had inadvertantly brought this into their lives. They didn't need this.
This conception of the virtual power of the painted image to become truly present could well be the spiritual frame that aroused and empowered the choices and artistic ambitions of Vermeer.
Once my fiance left, that man came over and told me and i just egnored him.
It is totally gorgeous and is a must have to add to your collection!
Since this is Hop is all about kids, we ask that if you have kids, grandkids, nieces, nephews the neighbor's kids!!! any kid!!! LOL have them look at all the projects we have created... It would be great to have kids comment on our projects!! Just put your child's name and age and you can type what they say about our projects! If you don't have kids, don't worry!! you can still participate!!!
Despite the trail’s name, I didn’t see any osprey. But I have every reason to believe they frequent the area and that on future visits I might be lucky enough to see one. But the Osprey Trail, a 3.2-mile trail along the south shore of Lake Townsend between Church and Yanceyville streets, has plenty of wildlife and other attractions to recommend it for a day hike. Here are a few highlights of the trail:
A small question with the potential for large impact. This open-ended question of what you expect can give way to various reflective responses. In the days ahead many people will find that they are waiting and wondering about the coming attractions of their life. Much like in a movie theater, people sit watching the screen with anticipation of the start of the main attraction: Coming soon the year 2011.
2. My Little Grass Shack
“Do you like it?” she asked me. “The most important thing is you should like it.”
Read The Wide Horizon
Bon week-end!
hair is getting curlier and curlier (as well as getting balder and balder) but we'll just focus on the first thing and pretend the 2nd thing isn't happening
Huzzah, it’s midnight.
Woo Hoo!!
First off, the title: “Why Wasn’t Cabin in the Woods Scary?” I hoped the article was going to educate those who were missing the point because they were disappointed over the movie’s real nature (non-stop funny, smart, well-characterized—the list goes on, but “scary” isn’t on it), but instead the writers used it as a soap box to discuss what the movie allegedly did wrong … thus missing the point themselves.
I wish I could do that
Speaking in London following the Somalia conference, Sr. Garcia-Margallo said “If the two parts of the United Kingdom are in agreement that it is in accord with their constitutional arrangement, written or unwritten, Spain would have nothing to say. We would simply maintain that it does not affect us.”
Here’s what I said in the submission:
Then, after the cabinets are dry you apply 2 coats of the bond/colored paint. The color we chose is called "Linen." It's a slightly off-white color, but still very bright and crisp.
On a replay, they saw the Challenger explode.
Looting a plasma screen telly and only fessing up when you're caught is fine, just pay the cost of it and we'll say no more. If you're an expense-fiddling MP, that is. If you're an urban youth, that'll be several years in jail.
It took 5 years to find that it wasn’t Three Dog Night that wrote the song, but a guy named Levon Helm and The Band
New evidence of racist restaurant waitstaff may leave a bad taste in the mouths of African-American diners.
Sellassie is an alternative in today’s hip-hop, proof that there are young black artists that can make music that is creative, street and smart. Bringing a fresh perspective to the game, Sellassie stands firm to his message, has a charismatic presence and is evidence that not every rapper raps negatively, glorifying drugs, guns, women, money or their ego. Masterfully articulating the struggle, Sellassie’s art is poetry on hip hop beats, music that identifies with scholars and people in the ghetto alike.
influence and nurture.
No, I had to return him. It was the right thing to do. In the morning, I’d call the family and pass on the good news. If I wanted a dog for myself I could always rescue one from the shelter.
Things I didn't like ran the gamut. First of all, the premise was a bit cheesy. I wasn't buying the "three promises" thing even though the author tried very hard to make a case for it. I didn't like the fact that they used the Lord's name in vain a number of times. The story would not have been hurt if those words had been deleted, though the young man Ben resembling Jesus and then saying "Oh, God" was funny in a twisted sort of way.
SPEAK
People who are sanctimonious about international events. I am in no way saying that the quake in Haiti was not an enormous tragedy, because it was. That being said, I am sick of people who seem to have adopted a sort of how-dare-you attitude. "How can you think about buying shoes when Haiti?" "How can you talk about Hollywood gossip when Haiti?" "How can you HAVE A BEER WHEN HAITI????" Are you people serious? I am not going to stop spending money on coffee and shoes just because Haiti. I donated. I have done my bit. Feeling bad for Haiti is not going to help Haiti. Guilt-tripping everyone I know is not going to help Haiti.
Makes for some amazing texture.
I kind of think the used mink might be the best thing I have ever gotten. It's warm. It's soft. It's oddly flattering. It's comfortable. It does glorious things for my 40+ year old skin. I can insouciantly toss it on over any old thing and I truly do feel glamourous. It cost about 7% of what a new mink cost, and it cost less than a new coat costs. It's real honest to God recycling, and I wonder who owned it before me.
Blue-Green Algae is widely used in dietary supplements and is purported to performing a range of tasks from preventing cancer to boosting one’s immune system. Cyanobacteria is frequently used in food products and labeled as “non-animal protein source”.
Reaping the sowing seeds of his ancestor’s grain
REAGAN: Son, I just wanted to let you know that you’re doing great. Everything you’re doing is exactly what I would have done, at least, in my first term.
Just calling in to say hello to everyone and yes I'm still around - just taking my time about things right now! Lots of ideas awaiting these horrible fingers of mine healing themselves,
I'm interested in your opinions. Please comment and tell me what you think. Should I recontact Avalon? Is it worth my while? Do I stand a chance to recover from this terrible flub-up?
Despite major budget concerns, I still have a great job. I have great kids that still drive me nuts, however, I wouldn't want it any other way. And, I have a meaningful, loving relationship with a woman who allows me to be me.
#58: Back of the same card, as an example. All of the cards have a puzzle piece, but no text. I'm guessing that this is part of Bruce Boxleitner's right arm as seen in card #44.
Running out of time
David smiled. “My role is to deliver you where you’re supposed to be before they can attach themselves to you. And also to catch them and keep them away from others. That’s where you’re going to help us.”
after all of that and just so y'all know, many deleted paragraphs, in the words of the best president we ever had except he was only on tv...
I love all the little details. It's just here with us until my friends (or I) find a buyer....at which point I'll recuperate my investment. :)
Okay, this post isn't as original because I really didn't know what to post for the letter Y, but my blogging/twitter gal-boyfriend 'Dy posted it on this and I thought, "Oh yeahhhhhhhhh...". So here ya go. LOL *thanks 'Dy for her idea*
improve the appearance of the city.
31Him God has put on high at his right hand, as a Ruler and a Saviour, to give to Israel a change of heart and forgiveness of sins.
Cookies will keep for several days in an airtight container.
Seaweed, a deep forest green,
When I say PURPLE make two little circles
Landshark Lager from the Margaritaville Brewing Company.
So when I was checking blog updates I saw a bunch of "linked" updates and was wondering why everyone posted them a day early. Then I realized that it was Friday today. It's been a long week. :)
Pass by, hearing not, or answer not a word!
After a lot of thought I have decided that this will be my last post on this blog. I will still be blogging about my family life, self reliance and everything else but it will be over at One Crafty Habitat
The Execution
After reading this and you think all I have written here is of a great help then, do not sit there and waste your time, Act now. Get back with your ex!
I'm sure many of you heard how I wasn't going to the annual Austin City Limits Fest because of all the...hmmm...how did I put it...."Shit-bag, prozac induced, indie pop bands that suck ass" that are clogging the big stages.
If Mrs. Breivik senior is completely innocent of the knowledge of her son’s terrorist activities then I am sure nobody could complain about protecting her from prosecution if Breivik opened up and admitted the truth about who his real English ‘mentor’ is. It is obviously this man who has brainwashed Breivik and sent him out to commit his acts so he should be held to account the same as Breivik himself.
However since spying these bad boys on the Paperself website I need to find me a Hallowe'en party! (Oh and £12.50 to spend on exquisitely fabulous fake eyelashes.) Seriously how much fun are these!!
A couple of days ago, I shared Greg Kulowiec’s great post on the Why of iPads. Many districts are jumping on the mobile learning bandwagon without really giving it a lot of thought. Greg provides a nice foundation for anyone who’s thinking about implementing iPads as part of learning.
I was surprised by the Maguro (blue-fin tuna) nigiri; I find that this widely-popular fish has an awful metallic taste when not of the utmost quality. This exceedingly fresh specimen while not my sashimi of choice was highly enjoyable.
It swung back and forth so much; at first Mike looked like he had no chance after I took out his Rune Priests and 2 whole Grey Hunter squads with minimal cost. But then due to a little luck on his part, the timing of our reserves, and my over confidence, let him nearly take out all 3 of my scoring units. But a little luck got me out of that sticky position and not let the game slip from me. However in the 6th and 7th turn it kept swinging back and forth as our dice either deserted or supported us. In the end my Terminators resilience and firepower won my through, but hell it was not an easy ride to get those 20 points.
Decorate the Bulletin Board with colored Butcher paper of your choice as a background. Use a contrasting borders that complements the color you chose.
Days passed by and Pete became sick because of advancing age. On one particular bright morning, Lily visited him. She was agonized and considerate about his frail health and asked him to go get himself examined by some doctor. And the reply came- BE silent and hug me. She was at once astounded at this but still, she wasn’t angry. Lily just hugged him; unlike others who used to just walk way whenever Pete used those words. With that hug, Lily became speechless and was all of a sudden joyous, forgetting about all the worries. Pete then said into her ear See the power of the hug; it can put an end to everything that makes us feel pained.
So is the enemy as evil as we make them out to be?
Something totally off topic from the above… I have been wanting to travel to Europe for a long time now. My brother and I were planning a trip to Ireland sometime late this fall. My Aunt called me last week and asked me if we would like to go with her and my uncle. They have a time share and it will have an extra room. This really caught me off guard because it is very short notice. It was so nice of them to ask because it will save us a ton of money being able to stay with them. So long story short I spoke with my brother and we were able to get him a passport (thank goodness for expedited processing) and find plane tickets. So it looks like we will be going to Ireland (does a happy dance). The only thing is, we leave next Thursday the 12th! That is insane fast! So I have been getting things settled here so we can go and not have to worry about anything. However I worry about the plane seat. In fact I am so freaked out about it. I am flying United and according to the seat guru website the plane seats are 17″ wide. That’s going to be a tight squeeze. I will be sitting next to my brother though so we can lift the arm rest and I did call and reserve a seatbelt extender incase it’s needed. My biggest fear is being removed from the plane due to the seat. Maybe I am over thinking this too much, it’s quite possible I tend to do that often. I just don’t want to be embarrassed in front of all those people. I am really working on getting myself healthy and in shape but Ireland came before I could lose a few more lbs. I know everything happens for a reason and I am grateful that my aunt and uncle asked us along. I just cant help but being nervous.
Why the omission by Luke (or, more likely, the addition by Matthew)? Because Matthew is associated with the mission of James in Jerusalem, and is the most “Hebrew” of all the Gospels, while Luke is associated with Paul’s mission and is the most “Greek” of all the Gospels.
Elizabeth Mary Hayes (Con) 439
If you're over the crackle trend, you will not be interested. If you are like me, you may only opt for the colors that interest you.
“That’s an automatic reflex,” Rivera explained. “When you see a black or Latino youngster, particularly on the street, you walk to the other side of the street. You try to avoid that confrontation. Trayvon Martin, God bless him. He’s an innocent kid, a wonderful kid, a box of Skittles in his hand, he didn’t deserve to die, but I’ll bet you money if he didn’t have that hoodie on, that nutty neighborhood watch guy wouldn’t have responded in that violent and aggressive way.”
Someone recently commented on my blog asking why I post photos of the result of a serial killer's misdeeds. Also, "if this were someone you loved, would you want this on someone's site?"
When asked about their personal goals, they ubiquitously state that they are not only in E-Corps because they care about the environment; they are also here to make a better future for themselves and their family. It’s a physically and mentally demanding job, but there are undeniable perks to being able to support their families with a steady wage, work towards graduation, and earn a scholarship for higher education simultaneously. I love speaking with them about their plans after graduation, and it is always exciting when they talk about wanting to continue conservation work as a career in the future. In addition, they help inspire the next generation of environmental stewards, as they often take their kids to site on the weekends to hike and see what they’re working on.
My son’s art reflects the commitment he has to his craft. He is passionate about his paintings, paintings that reflect his bold aesthetic, and his courageous sense of place and humor. They are audacious and larger than life, both dimensionally and artistically.
My efforts resulted in a 4th place finish so I’m pretty stoked on that. I honestly have been “Mr. Consistency” for the last few events as I was never passed by anyone nor did I pass anyone in my AG. I guess it’s not a bad thing.
“Huh?”
Morning Sweet Stampers, I hope the sun is shining for you this morning, it certainly is over Sweet Stampin Towers as we're having a little relaxing holiday this week! We're by the pool in some exotic location drinking cocktails...hmm time to wake up I think!
There's a cuckoo, and one or two thrushes,
The last two marathon distances I ran, I ran too quickly for the first maybe 20 miles and died towards the end. My pace maybe only changed by about a minute a mile for the last 6 or so miles, but it made the runs hard and this time I wanted to try and start slower and finish strongly if possible. I also wanted to practice running a bit slower than normal at about 8:30 – 9:00 min mile pace over a long distance.
Most of my friends have two girls.Even in school girls were more than the boys.There were 17 girls and 12 boys.At my work place too there were more girls than the boys.In the bank where i used to work there were 10 girls and 4 boys.
A quick explanation is perhaps needed here.
‘Look at the album title,’ Ollie said. They all looked. It was ‘The Sound of Silence’.
and has been born for us on the way
4. Pour half of the sauce over the popcorn, mix it around with a couple of wooden spoons until the popcorn is covered and then pour the remaining half in, again mixing it all around until the popcorn is covered.
Caroline coveted her neighbour’s scarf. It was the perfect balance of warm (reds and umbers and autumn ambers) and cold (tiny sequins in the subtlest greens and purples and silvers, shoals and shoals of them spun out over the threads).
I’ve also been taking note of the new lightning effects in MoP. They’re really neat, but they seem oddly inconsistent in what they affect. Maybe they’re not finished yet. I hardly noticed they existed until I saw the lantern-carrying guards in Stormwind.
I always thought I was extremely lucky to have found one true love in my life. A second love didn’t seem likely.
I’m the keeper of nightmares
Stay tuned until NEXT THURSDAY.. because then you get to meet another fabulous member of the Guest Design Team. Don't forget to check out the daily projects that Jess has going at www.kinderstampo.com . Come join the fun.
(Two people clad in black enter. Their faces are hidden under a hood. Other people who are dressed the same way position themselves in the audience. Those who are on the stage grab each of Anwaar’s hands.)
The Psalm is substantially composed of two scenes. The first part (cf. vv. 1-9) portrays a solemn epiphany of the Lord “in his sanctuary” (v. 6), that is, the Temple of Zion. It is preceded and followed by the songs and sacrificial rites of the congregation of the faithful. The current of praise flows steadily before the divine majesty: “Sing to the Lord a new song … sing … sing … bless … tell of his salvation … tell God’s glory … declare his marvellous works … ascribe to the Lord glory and power … give to the Lord the glory … bring offerings … bow down before him!” (vv. 1-3.7-9).
Mandingo doesn't call the collision of black and white on the minefield of capitalism "combustible," it sketches race in America as a fucking wad of nitroglycerin packed up the ass of a Parkinson's-afflicted mule that's trapped inside a rickety old truck speeding over a very bumpy road in the mountains — a bomb so potent, it's exploded again and again and again. 1863 New York, the summer of 1919, 1923 Rosewood, 1943 Detroit, Watts '65, Newark in '67, Memphis '68, L.A. '92, Cincinnati in '01, Emmett Till, O.J., hell, the election of Obama — Ken Norton's dong lit the fuse deep inside Susan George's disarranged guts, gracing each successive chapter of the American saga, both black and white, with ashes and rubble.
The problem is that neither outcome, in prospect, is compatible with the couple undertaking the traditional arrangement. If the wife is likely to be left with nothing (the rarely-realized feminist boogyman) she will be very unlikely to be willing to devote herself to home and hearth. On the other hand, if the man is at risk of losing half of everything he has earned to his ex (the “find a woman I don’t like and buy her a house” theory of marriage) he is unlikely to want his wife to stay home.
This third eye is actually the projected energy of the pineal gland, located in the center of the brain, and it can be felt burning a hole in the middle of your forehead if for example, you drink too much Robitussin or have activated your Kundalini through deep chakra work. The pineal gland is where the soul allegedly enters the body on the 22nd day after conception.... and it's where I would enter if I was an alien on the outside looking in. Who cares if another soul is already in there? You're just passing through.
“Sometimes that is the problem when fans are taken for granted – not just our fans but those at all football clubs, It could have been made a bit easier for them, but they will get there.”
The whole time he was there in the Pacific- like in Okinawa or Iowa Jima- every ten steps someone else got blown up.
One word answer, cupcake!
But it is clear that the acts the police are investigating are only part of the problem. This episode has touched off angers, fears, resentments, and suspicions that range far beyond this immediate cause. It has done so because the episode has brought to glaring visibility underlying issues that have been of concern on this campus and in this town for some time—issues that are not unique to Duke or Durham but that have been brought to the fore in our midst. They include concerns of women about sexual coercion and assault. They include concerns about the culture of certain student groups that regularly abuse alcohol and the attitudes these groups promote. They include concerns about the survival of the legacy of racism, the most hateful feature American history has produced.
3 upstairs
Furthermore then we beseech you, brethren, and exhort you by the Lord Jesus, that as ye have received of us how ye ought to walk and to please God, so ye would abound more and more. For ye know what commandments we gave you by the Lord Jesus. For this is the will of God, even your sanctification, that ye should abstain from fornication: That every one of you should know how to possess his vessel in sanctification and honour; Not in the lust of concupiscence, even as the Gentiles which know not God: That no man go beyond and defraud his brother in any matter: because that the Lord is the avenger of all such, as we also have forewarned you and testified. For God hath not called us unto uncleanness, but unto holiness. He therefore that despiseth, despiseth not man, but God, who hath also given unto us his holy Spirit.
Other possible uses: MAY help with children who have AD/HD become more balanced there are some sources that say Essential Oils can have positive effects on those with Autism spectrum disorders. Essential Oils help with brain Health. It can also help with balance problems.
Lineage
So what is your take? Do we need a specialist court for IP infringement cases? Or are we better off without them (particularly since we botched up the IPAB). Does IP really require special skills and training? Wouldn't it be better to have generalist judges decide IP cases as well? As a wise man once said: the trouble with specialisation is that over time, you know more and more about less and less.
with each passing day
Thanks so much, Debi! He is adorable!
"Your legs are very sexy," I said, trying to be smooth. I don't think it worked because Jen rolled her eyes at me. After getting off the phone earlier I thought that tonight was going to be a sure thing but now I was having doubts. She spun her chair and faced me so I turned and faced her. Here in the sun filled diner Jen's beauty really showed itself to me. I wanted to hold her face in my hands and feast on her lips. I wanted her bad so I was not going to give up easily.
He isn't supposed to be "forced" to deploy until he's been home for 12 months, and he had other plans for Fort Hood: enrolling in an 18-month EOD school before deploying again. (EOD! More aurgh!)
They didn’t want to do it again after that.
and 200 Foot Garden (details on a really fun commuter/community garden).
He strained to hear the drip of a melting icicle, a drift of falling snow, the rustle of a waking squirrel in a lofty nest. Peering at his backtrail, Brodie stepped backwards, shaking his feet to reposition the snowshoes and not caring about the increased noise. If his stalker thought he was on the move, perhaps the person, or beast, would reveal themselves. Brodie's skin crawled with the sense of being watched, but nothing besides himself moved.
The Flowering Crabs (Crabapples) are blooming in town. Photographing them was my reward for not passing out during the mammo:)
I tried to imagine what a loving, perfect God would be like and couldn’t reconcile Him with a God who’d use tokens and secret handshakes to determine who could enter His kingdom. What kind of omniscient, omnipotent Father in Heaven was powerless to save His people without code words and veil work administered by the hands of men?
I was never a huge fan. "You Gotta Fight" was one of the most annoying moments of the soundtrack to my youth. I hated it. I didn't listen to the rest of the album and the Beastie Boys had a long way to go if they had any hope of me ever listening to them again.
Put the egg whites in the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the whisk attachment and whip on medium-high speed. Once the whites start holding soft peaks, gradually sprinkle the remaining 1/2 cup ( 100 grams ) sugar over them, and continue beating until they hold peaks.
Well, one thing led to another and it just turns out that I happened to WIN! Howz 'bout dat??
Trying my best to not get distracted from dissertation writing, but what can you do when the topic is about shoes marketed through social media. It might have been a smart thing to write about something that does not require me hanging on blogs and twitter and of course something that is not as beautifully distracting as shoes... So in the name of research, my new boots.
Damaged and devoid.
Favorite line: “They were lonely and sad people, all three of them, and they would not make one another less sad, but they could, with great care, make a world that would accommodate their loneliness.”
-Vitamin C: the average adult needs 75mg per day; this amount must be increased to 100mg per day in pregnancy and to 150mg per day during breast feeding. Bear in mind that vegetables when boiled for 15 to 60 minutes lose 25 to 60% of their vitamin C, which passes into the boiling water. Fruits do not lose their vitamin C when they are made jam, because sucrose protects the vitamin C from oxidation. Furthermore, frozen vegetables lose approx 24% of their vitamin C; for example, 100gr of fresh green peas contain 7.5% of vitamin C, but if frozen at 0C their content in vitamin C diminishes to 4%.
Tennis champion
Are you where you're supposed to be?
President-elect: Rachel Powell
Overall Wright’s work is not a light read. After about the fifth poem the reader realizes they aren’t going to get away with just flying through the poem halfheartedly and be rewarded. Wright’s work forces its readers to meditate and chew on what they’ve just read. What is apparent is that Wright, through his endless exploration of the essence of man, has garnished some wisdom over the years that is passed along through his poetry. This a collection, as much of Wrights work, for those who aren’t afraid to ask some of life’s “bigger” questions.
